 Jacob Lindley 's Account Of a Journey to attend the Indian Treaty, pro
-posed to be held at Sandusky in the year 1793;
 interspersed with various observations remarks,
 and circumstances, that occurred on this inte-
resting occasion. INTRODUCTION As preliminary information to the reader, it may
 be proper to state, that about the year 1791, a mis-
understanding existed between the United States,
 and several of the Indian Tribes. On this occasion,
 the Meeting for Sufferings held in Philadelphia, ad-
dressed a memorial to Congress, the object of which
 was, to show the expediency of pursuing pacific
measures towards settling the disputes with the In-
dians. Their representation was well received; —
 but the measures they recommended were not then
adopted; and the calamities of war still continuing to
prevail on the Western frontiers of the States,--
 the Yearly Meeting held in 1792, appointed a large
Committee, to unite with the Meeting for Sufferings,
 in deliberating on this momentous subject, and if
 practicable, to recommend such measures, as would
 be most likely to promote peace and friendship with
 the Indians. Early in the year 1793, deputies from several In-
dian Nations, visited Philadelphia, with a view of
 forwarding an accommodation of differences with
 the United States: and, Government having agreed
 that a treaty should be held in the Indian country,
 near Detroit, during the summer following, — those
 Indian deputies repeatedly urged that some Friends
 should attend the negociations, stating, that “the
 Nations they represented had a special confidence
 in Friends, as a people who, from their first settle-
ment in America, had manifested a steady adherence
 to the maintenance of peace and friendship with the
 Natives.” In accordance with the desire which
 Friends had long felt, to promote peace, the propo-
sal was acceded to; and six Friends were deputed to
 accompany the Commissioners appointed by govern-
ment, on this occasion, after having obtained the
 President's approbation. The Commissioners appointed on this embassy
 were, general Benjamin Lincoln , colonel Timothy
 Pickering, and Beverly Randolph , Esq. The Friends
 who accompanied them, were, John Parrish , William
 Savery, and John Elliott , of Philadelphia, Jacob
 Lindley, of Chester county, and Joseph Moore and
 William Hartshorne , of New Jersey. See Halliday Jackson 's valuable work, lately pub-
lished, entitled, Civilization of the Indian Natives,
page 7, 8 — Oliver Paxson 's Letter to John Simpson ,
 page 31, vol. 1— also, the interesting "Narrative
 of the Mission of the United Brethren, among the
 Delaware and Mohegan Indians," by John Hecke-
welder, printed 1820 — page 401-3. 
I left my dear wife and family on first-day morn-
ing, the 28th of the 4th month, 1793. It was a close
 trial to both, and the more so, as our youngest child
 was much indisposed. But the resignation and for-
titude with which my beloved companion was sup-
ported, helped me to bear the separation beyond my
 expectation. My beloved friend Joshua Pusey , accompanied
 me from home. The morning was wet and windy.
 When we came to Brandywine, it was high. We
 ferried over, and got to Concord meeting; which
opportunity tended to stay and quiet my mind. —
 After meeting we went on to Darby, and lodged at
 our kind friend John Hunt 's, where, by him and
 his beloved Rachel , we were tenderly cared for. 29th. We went to Philadelphia, where I met with
 John Parrish , William Savery , John Elliott and Jo-
seph Moore, who were to be my fellow travellers
 in the journey. They informed me, that Timothy 
Pickering and Beverly Randolph proposed to set
 out on horseback next day. On which information,
 it was mutually agreed, that John Parrish , Joseph
 Moore and John Elliott , should proceed with them
 to Niagara Falls: and William Savery and myself
 proceed by way of New York to accompany Benja-
min Lincoln, who had gone to New York some days
before. 30th. I felt my mind not quite easy to proceed,
 without having an interview with the President of
 the United States, which I suggested to William Sa-
very, and found he was under a like impression. —
 Accordingly, James Pemberton , William Savery ,
 John Elliott and myself, went about nine o'clock;
 met with a favourable reception, and had a full op-
portunity to relieve our minds: which we thought
 tended to his satisfaction, as well as ours. About
 one o'clock; our three friends and two Commis-
sioners set out on horseback. 1st of 5th mo. William Savery and myself, with
 five other passengers, set out in the stage for New 
York. Got to Brunswick about dark, having rode
 sixty miles. Next day in the afternoon, we arrived
 at New York. 3rd. Waiting for the baggage to come on by wa-
ter from Amboy, and providing for our journey. I
 think I never saw Friends so active and heartily
 disposed to comfort and assist, as were a number of
our brethren and sisters of that city. 4th. Went on board the Schenectady sloop, Capt.
 Lansing. Our beloved friend, William Hartshorne ,
 one of our companions in this journey, met us here,
 and went on board also, at the Albany pier in the
 East river. The wind at southwest, we got round
 the point, and about five miles up the North river,
 when the wind shifted, and a violent gale ensued
 from the north east. The tide also leaving us, we
were obliged to cast anchor, and lay tossing all night,
 just in sight of the city. The wind increased so
 much that our vessel dragged her anchor, and ran
 almost ashore. About daylight our captain ran in
 to the wharf again. We took the opportunity of
 going to forenoon and afternoon meetings. At the
last of which, William Savery desired to see Friends
 and others, at seven o'clock in the evening. About
 which time, the streets being crowded with people
 going to meeting, the captain sent a messenger to 
call us on board. The strait indeed was great; but
 William and I agreed, let the consequences be what
 they might, we would attend the meeting; we did
 so, and a favoured time it was. About nine o'clock, 
 several Friends, merchants of the city, accompanied
 us to the vessel, where the passengers and captain
 were in a heat; but we kept down, and it blew over.
 Capt Lansing told me afterwards with seriousness,
 he did believe the storm was permitted in order to
 give us time for the meeting. About midnight they weighed anchor, and stood
 up the North river. Our progress was slow and te-
dious, which gave us opportunity to view the rug-
ged margin of that great water, which exhibited sub-
jects for awful contemplation. The rocks and moun-
tains rise from the water several hundred feet high;
 on the tops of divers of which, are the remains of
 fortifications made in the time of the late war; at
 some of which places, bloody contests had been
 held. We passed West Point, Fort Putnam, and 
divers others on the tops of the highest hills, com-
manding the prospects of diSirent reaches of the
 North river. 7th. We passed a stream tumbling over the rocks
 into the river, called the Buttermilk Falls — a good
seat for a mill. But the barren appearance of the
banks, with the prospect of the divers dark habita-
tions of death and destruction, brought me into a
 humbling sense of the excellency of that holy reli-
gion, which breathes peace on earth and good will
 to men. The situation of these strong holds on the
tops and peaks of mountains, perhaps three or four
hundred feet high, were associated with ideas which
more strongly confirmed my mind in the approach
of that day, in which the King of kings will exalt
his holy mountain above them all. Passed by New Windsor, New Marlborough, and
Barnagat. At the latter are many limekilns, which
 burn lime for New York. The kilns are in the
 bank, close to the river. Poughkeepsie is a village
 on the east side of the river. The land appears bar-
ren and shrubby, especially where the limestone
 mostly abounds. 8th. About six in the morning, arrived at Alba-
ny, having sailed one hundred miles in twelve hours.
 Last night we passed the city of Hudson, where a
 number of Friends reside. At Albany we met with
 great civility. The minister of the congregation in-
troduced himself to us, and said he wished our er-
rand crowned with success; and that he would make
 it his care, publicly to offer up his prayers for us,
 which would be joined by ten or eleven hundred
 others, and he hoped would be available. He ap-
peared a good natured, tender spirited man. His
 name was Bassett . In the afternoon, five Indians passed through this
 town. I stopped them at the city tavern, gave them
 some refreshment, and money to bear their expenses.
 Their company consisted of an old woman, a son,
 two daughters, and a grandson. One of the young
 women was named Mehetable , the other Keturah .
 Our secretary, Story, sent a written message to Cap-
tain Hendricks, at the Oneida Lake, by one of the
 young men, one hundred and twenty miles distant:
 which he engaged to deliver in three days. They all
 appeared simple, and their countenances innocent.
 Their name and visage impressed my mind with a
 remembrance of good old Abraham, Isaac and Jacob. The city of Albany is chiefly settled with the de-
scendants of emigrants from Holland. They are
 generally a recluse, busy people: which bears the
 appearance of inhospitality, or want of sociability 
 and attention to strangers. When we arrived at the
 city tavern, we found general Lincoln nearly alone.
 He was very anxious to move forward that after-
noon, for which purpose a horse and chair was sought
 and procured: the horse was a poor old gray, such
 as I have seen turned out to die. This treatment of
 the general roused my feelings for the honour of our
 government, and the regard due to its respectable
 officers: of which number I considered him as one —
 especially on the present intended peaceful embassy.
 I then went out, and represented the reflections it
 must draw upon the reputation of the place, to Capt.
 Lansing and some others, who had exulted much in
 the antiquity and reputation of their city. They
 pretty soon procured a better horse and sulkey, and
 the old friend proceeded that evening to Schenecta-
dy. We staid all night at Albany, and observed
 their manner of burial; where no women attended:
 neither do they on any such occasions, attend the
 corpse of the nearest relative to the grave. The
 females assemble at the house, and immediately af-
ter the coffin is borne out, they proceed to eat cakes,
 drink wine, and smoke tobacco for a short time; and
 then all clear out before the men return. The men
 resume the feast, made in consequence of the decease
 of their neighbor or friend, regale themselves, and
 return home. 9th. We got into a wagon, and rode sixteen miles
 to Schenectady, situated near the Mohawk river. —
 We passed about ten houses on the road, each a ta-
vern. The land very poor and covered with pines,
 the whole of the way. The town of Schenectady is
 supposed to consist of about three hundred houses,
 mostly Dutch built, except some modern houses of
 more elegant construction. It appears strange to see
 the manners and customs of the people, and the face
 of the country: yet my mind is mercifully preserved
 in great quietude, and every place looks and feels
 like a temporary home. Dined at a public house in
 Schenectady, where we had the pleasure of General
 Schuyler's company. After dinner, we went on
 board a batteau, accompanied by seven others, load-
ed with our baggage and stores, and embarked on
 the Mohawk river, in the presence of more than
 one hundred spectators. Two of our boats were
 manned with six men each, the other six boats with
 three men each. We proceeded about four miles,
 and stopped at a house, where the mother and three
 children were entirely insane. The three children
 never learned to speak, being idiots — the mother
 went distracted, and was confined in chains. The
 several circumstances attending this distressed fami-
ly, deeply affected my mind, and caused me secretly
 to acknowledge, that I was not thankful enough for
 the manifold favours and blessings, mercifully dis-
pensed to me. The bed of the Mohawk river I suppose to be
 about two hundred yards across, and averaging three
 feet deep; some places shoal and rapid, where the
 poor boatmen had very hard work to make headway
 against the current. The river winds across a val-
ley about half a mile wide; alternately washing the
 southern and northern hills. The bottoms in the
 bends, and on the banks of the river, are rich black
 sand, exceeding fertile, and tolerably improved, pro-
ducing wheat, Indian corn, peas, flax, &c in abun-
dance. We had an agreeable prospect of a range of
 fine plantations, interspersed with an abundance of
 fruit trees in blossom. Vegetation appeared about
as forward here as when I left home. It is an old
 settled country: the inhabitants mostly the descen-
dants of Low Dutch emigrants, and generally, speak
 that language, also, tolerable English. They say it
 was settled before Schenectady or Albany; which
 must be more than one hundred and twenty years.
 One young woman told me, her father's great-grand-
father was born on the place where she then lived.
 The banks of the river, in general, rise about twelve
 or fifteen feet above the surface of the water, and
 obscure, in a great measure, the pleasing prospect
 of its fruitful margin from travelers who go in boats. 10th. Our little fleet, consisting of eight boats,
 worked by thirty men, exclusive of twelve passen-
gers, set out, and with great exertions, opposed the
rapids of the Mohawk for about sixteen miles, through
 a champaign country. Passed by many banks and
 points of land, memorable for having forts and for-
tifications, in time of war; particularly the old resi-
dence of Sir William Johnson , whose mansion house
 is now in ruins — the lands confiscated, and in pos-
session of strangers. This estate was said to have
 been obtained from the Indians by chicanery. Such
 is the uncertainty of the most extensive worldly pos-
sessions, more especially when obtained through un-
righteous channels. This day we passed a rock pro-
jecting out of the bank of the river, whereon was
 painted, with great ingenuity, in red colours, a ca-
noe with the representation of seven men in it.--
 Which is said to be done annually, by Indians,
 coming several hundred miles for that purpose, in
 order to commemorate the slaughter of seven In-
dians, who went off from that neighbourhood in
 some former wars, and were all destroyed. We
 passed the mouth of the Schoharie, and stopped
 about a mile higher up the river, on a beautiful
 bank, where we proposed to lodge. Here I saw a
 plough with two wheels, about eighteen inches dia-
meter, just before the coulter. They are in general
 use in this neighbourhood, and appear to answer the
 end well. Their land is level, light and rich near
 the river. Their field peas are just coming up, and
 appear luxuriant, and beautiful. 11th. Had a fine wind, our little fleet hoisted their
 sails, which propelled the boats against the current
 at about four miles an hour, without the help of set-
ting poles or oars. Passed the Canajoharie, and a
 mountain called the Nose, where is a remarkable
 cave, into which one of our boatmen said he enter-
ed about five perches, but found so much wind issu-
ing out of it, that he was afraid to proceed any fur-
ther. The land in this day's rout, is very good. The
 settlers here were greatly distressed, about the year
 1780, by the Indians and white people who were
 opposed to the principles of the revolution, and were
 influenced, and, in some instances, commanded, by
 John Johnson (son of Sir William ) who took refuge
 with the British, and came on with a party of In-
dians, &c. into his old neighbourhood, burnt their
 houses, took off many prisoners, and others they
 killed. Where we breakfasted, the man of the house
 told us, his father and father-in-law were both killed
 by them, on the same morning. Where we dined,
 the woman's husband had been killed, in like man-
ner. This day we passed several old fortifications,
 block houses, &c. which appeared a weak defence:
and breathing aspirations were raised, to become an 
 inhabitant of a city whose walls are salvation, and
 whose light and glory the Lord of hosts is. We
 also passed several places for worship. The whole
 journey of this day was about twenty-three miles.
 The country very fertile, and capable of abundant
 improvement, which may increase the useful trade
 of Schenectady and Albany, keep up the sound of
 the millstones near the North river, — largely occu-
py the merchants of New York, — and freight their
 ships with heavy burthens for distant climes. Ve-
getation appears nearly the same from day to day,
 as we proceed to the north west, which is the gen-
eral course of the river thus far. 12th. Which was the first of the week, we set
 out from Esq. Nellis's, which is about fifteen miles
 north of Otsego lake, the head source of the north
 branch of Susquehanna, and about fifty miles north
 of the boat and raft navigation of the Delaware. Pro-
ceeding up the river we found the water very shoal;
 in many places not more than fifteen inches deep.
 The navigation is exceedingly hurt by the river be-
ing divided into many parts by islands, some less,
 and some larger, from one to seventy acres in size.
 We landed and tarried awhile at Fort Hendricks on
 the south side of the river. Opposite, on the north
 side, comes in, a large stream, called Canada creek,
 about the size of Brandywine. This place was the
 seat of an old Indian king. We noticed many large
 old apple trees, said to have been planted by the
 Indians. This day, tho wind blew very brisk, and directly
against us; which made our progress slow, and the
 labour of the men exceeding hard. With consider-
able difficulty, we stemmed the current ten miles,
 to the falls of the river, which are thirty-eight and
 a half feet in three quarters of a mile. It is a very
 romantic spot. In one place, the water pitches down
 about seven feet. Here is a fine grist mill, saw mill,
 and fulling mill. A Scotch gentleman, named John
 Porteous, is the proprietor of the seat. It will, some
 time, in all probability, become a great interest. —
 Here are great preparations making to open a canal,
 which I think they will complete, as nature has done
 abundance toward facilitating this very important
 object. The river is contracted by rocks and hills
 to one hundred feet wide, at the falls, and for some
 distance below. At this place, a spacious wooden
 bridge is erected across the river. On the north
 side, are evident marks of nature having, at some
 very remote period of time, undergone a great re-
volution. I think it appears to a demonstration,
 that the river once ran among the rocks, that are
 now thirty perches from the present bed of the wa-
ter, and twenty feet above its level. Rocks and
 stones are lying in a very irregular position, but so
 smoothed, and worn into curves of many shapes,
 like ovens, large kettles, and some worn down like
 a hollow gum, six or seven feet deep, and bear every
 appearance of the rocks in the bed, and on the sides
 of the river, at present. This afternoon, we enga-
ged seven wagons to transport our stores and boats,
 one mile across these falls. We were kindly received
 by our friend Porteous , and the superintendent of
 the canal, a very intelligent man, Major Frederick
 Augustus De Zang; where I drank tea, and lodged.
 He emigrated from Saxony, and married Caleb Law-
rence’s daughter, of New York. Though this place
 is so rocky and wild, it is said a rattlesnake has not
 been found at any time, north of Canada creek. On
 the east side of that water, about seven miles distant,
 they abound to such a degree, that the settlers there
 are obliged, in their own defence, to keep large
 herds of swine, of three or four years old — and such
 is the sagacity of the swine, that they will set their
 foot on the head of the reptile, and begin at the tail
 to eat. Below these falls, for three miles, the water is an
 amazing depth — perhaps eighty feet deep. Here
 our setting poles were of no account, and our oars
 and paddles were not sufficient to propel the boat
 against the wind; so that at one time I did not know
 but we should here have made our beds. But through
 the abounding mercy of Him “who holdeth the winds
 in his fists, and measureth the waters in the hollow
 of his hand," we got through to comfortable lodgings.
 The three precedingg nights we lay on our mattresses,
 except the general, who was accommodated with a
 bed. 13th. The wagons assembled about sunrise, took
 our baggage and boats about one mile, to the still
 water above the falls. We dined at our friend Por
teous's — embarked in the afternoon — passed the
 wolf riffle and one other piece of strong water —
 about six miles, to the German Flats — on the way,
 passed several block houses, and one meeting house.
 Here we were but six miles north of the head wa-
ters of the Susquehanna. But it felt to me, a land
 of darkness, and a land of blood. Many of the peo-
ple had had their relations killed and scalped, whose
 spirits remain rough, and much exasperated against
 the Indians. 14th. Proceeded forward, and that evening reach-
 ed Fort Schuyler, where is erected a wooden bridge,
 whose arch is one hundred and twenty feet wide,
 without any support from below. The butments
 are of framed timber, without stone in any part of
them. The sweep of the arch appeared to be about
seven feet. The land in this day's progress, was
 very rich; and the whole face of the country, as far
 as I could see, was flat, and abounding with very
 large sugar trees, elm, white walnut, beech, &c. —
 The water, in this day's journey, which was about
 twenty-three miles, was a fine, deep, still run, great
 part of the way, without using our oars. This coun-
try settles rapidly. I was much perplexed for miles,
 with the continued smoke from the fires on shore,
 where they are clearing the lands, and manufacturing
 pot and pearl ash, and maple sugar. The potash is
 a great article of trade, selling at from forty-five to
 fifty pounds per ton. At New York, one merchant,
 I was told, procured one thousand tons the last year. 15th. The morning clear, and the air cold. Here
 the earth is very dry, having had but little rain for
 two months. Several of our company took horse at
 Whitestown, and rode to Fort Stanwix, at the head
 of the boat navigation, on the Mohawk river. The
 fort stands on the highest ground between the wa-
ters which run to the sea southward, and those which
 run into the Oneida lake, and empty into the St.
 Lawrence river. Our journey this day by water,
 was twenty-four miles. Those who rode by land,
 about sixteen miles. They passed the ground where
 a battle had been fought with the Indians, in the last
 war; in which many fell on both sides; but the In-
dians kept the ground. The skulls of divers remain
 on the ground, having the marks of the tomahawk
 and scalping knife evidently upon them. One of our
 party brought a skull along with him. The land as
 we came up the river, appears rich. The river about
 one hundred feet wide, and exceedingly crooked,
 much resembling a worm fence — the reaches about
 fifty perches long. The country very little settled.
 We dined in the woods, on the bank of the stream.
 The timber very large, — sugar trees are here in
 abundance — also buttonwood and white walnut of
 large size. Here, and for thirty miles below, hills
 and mountains quite disappear. The land on the
 dividing ridge, stony and thin, much covered with
 pitch pine. But when the earth shall disclose her
 blood, and no more cover her slain, a tremendous
 account must be settled, for the blood shed on the
 banks of the Mohawk. One skeleton, and a gun by
 his side, is said to have been harrowed up a few
 days past — the remains of a beaver hat, decayed
 stockings, &c. 16th. It took up this day to get the boats and bag-
gage across the carrying place, one mile, to Wood
creek, a small stream about ten yards wide, and very
 shoal. Five of our company, on the morning of the
 17th, took wagon, and proceeded down Wood creek
 by land. But such a ride I never had before. Pole
 bridges, slotches of mud and water, and short nob
 hills, sometimes one side, then another, like to over-
set; and the wagon very shackling, made the tour
 very disagreeable. However, in about three hours,
 we arrived at Captain Ranney 's, at the junction of
 Canada creek. The whole of the eight miles, a
 dreary hemlock and beech wilderness, without in-
habitant that I saw, except musquetoes in thousands.
 It appears well adapted for their existence. At the
 mouth of Canada creek we re-embarked, and pro-
ceeded down Wood creek eight miles to the Oak
 Orchard, where General Amhurst ’s army encamped
 on his way to the Canada expedition, in the French
 war. Here our little camp pitched their tents. I
 rested well on the bank of Wood creek. Struck our tents early in the morning of the 18th,
 and proceeded down the stream about six miles;
 then kindled up a fire on the bank, and cooked a
 breakfast of tea and chocolate. The land continues
 low, level, and rich, abounding with sugar trees and
 white walnut. The navigation of the creek is abun-
dantly obstructed by vast quantities of timber. —
 Here the stream is about fifty feet wide. These
 waters abound with fish, of which we caught some,
 with a gig, from the bow of our boat, and some
 trout, with hook and line. About noon, we dined
 at the Big Bend, four miles from the lake, on the
 bank of the creek, not having seen a cabin for twen-
ty- five miles. The banks abound with lofty timber,
 sugar trees, elm, some large oaks, and shellbark
 hickory, in which the pigeons innumerable build
 their nests. Here and there a small fox squirrel ap-
pears, — a few robins, blackbirds, and jays. About
 three o'clock we came to the entrance of Oneida
 lake, which, though among the number of inferior
 lakes, makes an awful appearance, and is doubtless
 a wonderful display of that infinite Wisdom and
 Power by which the worlds were made. Our course
 along this little ocean appeared to be a little north
 of west; and the wind being brisk from that point,
 we raised our tents, as no habitation appeared. This evening, a number of Indians came to our
 camp, viz. Col. Lewis , Capt. John , and a very old
 chief, named Beechtree , or King Doe, and several
 young warriors, painted red, with black streaks. —
 Some had their ears cut in strings, with trinkets in
 them; and they mostly had bobs of wampum, metal,
 or bright shells, hung in their noses. They had
 two of their wives with them— each had a child
 laced with its back to a board — the front side made
 of skins, lined with soft flannel, and a canopy of
 curious work like embroidery, overhead — of like
 workmanship, were the laces and bandages with
 which the infant was fastened in — these they loose
 with great facility, and take out the babe. The
 whole has the appearance of a case, narrow at bot-
tom, and widens upwards — it is about two feet in
 length, and has a bow to the front side of it, to go
 over the mother's breast, when she carries the child.
 There were about eleven Indians in this company;
 Kirkland , their missionary, was with them, and in-
terpreted for us. The old chief said he heard we
 were there, and with trembling knees, leaning on
 his staff, he had come to see us; as we were on the
 work of peace, he rejoiced to see us on that errand,
 and hoped the Great Spirit would bless our endea-
vours, with which he united, and did not know
 what he lived for, except it was to see it. Captain
 John spoke to like import, and said he was glad
 some of the sons of Onas were along. We imparted
 some small tokens of respect to the women and chil-
dren, who after a visit of about two hours, went
 away, with some of the young men. The old ones
 staid and supped with us on the bank of the lake,
 and then departed. About eight in the evening, the wind lulled, we
 struck our tents, and hurried on board. The lake
was smooth, and the moon shining. We went with
 our oars, beautifully, about twelve miles. Suddenly
 there appeared a cloud rising in the south-west,
 which soon spread, and obscured the light of the
 moon. It began to rain, with a heavy gale of wind,
 and the scene was soon changed, from serenity and
 calmness, into a foaming tempest. Our little fleet
 got scattered — the swells became so great as to ren-
der oars useless. The water being shoal, and the
 shore rocky, we durst not attempt to run in. Our
 boatmen proposed to raise the mast, and hoist sail;
which, with great difficulty, from the beating of the
 waves, and the extreme darkness, was effected. —
After which, our little bark ran violently before the
wind, rocking over the swells like a tub on the wa-
ter. But through the providence of Almighty pow-
er, about break of day, we got into the mouth of the
 Oneida river, though several of our boats did not
 arrive for some hours after. This lake is about thir-
ty miles long, and eight wide. In crossing which,
 I underwent a close and searching baptism, not only
 respecting the present embassy, but all the actions
 of my life: for eternity appeared very near. 19th. Being first day, we resumed our navigation
 down the Oneida river about eighteen miles, to the
 junction of the Seneca or Onondago river. It is
 about as large as the Oneida; each perhaps three hun-
dred feet wide. At this place we met three families
 of new settlers, who were glad to see us, as were
 we to see them. Here also we met several Indians,
 mostly young men and women, marvellously trim-
med with cut ears, ear-rings and nose jewels. --
 Amongst them, was a young warrior, grimly paint-
ed; even his hair painted and plaited, and stood out
 on each side in opposite directions. Here we had conversation with a man who lives
 at the Salt Springs on the Cayuga Lake, which is
 about ten miles long and seven broad. He related
 that when wood was provided, and two kettles set,
 of sixty gallons each, he could make five bushels
 per day; that the fountain appeared inexhaustible;
 that excellent fresh water springs were found within
twelve yards of the salt; and that eighteen miles land
carriage would take it to the Chemung river, a branch
 of the west fork of the Susquehanna. We resumed our voyage — passed about a mile of
rapid water — and afterwards eleven miles of still
 water, to Oswego Falls. Here the river is about
 two hundred yards wide, and the water at one pitch
 all across the river, falls eight feet, and forms a
 strong, foaming rapid for one mile below. The
 banks of this river are low, and subject to be over-
flowed. The land apparently rich. 20th. Drew our boats across the carrying place,
 about sixty yards, launched in below, and proceed-
ed to Oswego garrison, held by the British. They
expecting us, we were admitted, and dined with the
 commanding officer, Capt. Wickham . After dinner,
 we pursued our journey on the sea of Ontario, fifteen
 miles to a harbor called Little Sodus. Grand indeed
 is the prospect of this great lake. About the middle
 there is no view of land northward, eastward or
 westward in the clearest day. 21st. We sailed and rowed, passed the mouth of
 Great Sodus, to Apple Boom harbour, twenty-seven
 miles from Little Sodus. This day was exceeding
 warm on the lake, and the journey very lonesome.
 Day after day not a face to be seen, but our own
 company. The water of the lake is clear and cold;
 much more so than the rivers which empty into it.
 Our navigation is along the southern margin of On-
tario. The land appears well timbered and habita-
ble; but I could perceive no springs, or small rivu-
lets emptying into the lake. The shore is composed
 of high banks for miles together; then low vallies in
 succession, which form bays and harbors for the
 boatmen in case of sudden storms of wind, which
 are very frequent, and make a surprising commotion
 in the waters. In these storms many adventurers,
 after enduring amazing difficulties, have perished;
 and others have marvellously escaped. We did not
venture more than one mile from shore. The water
 is from three to ten feet deep — the bottom, appear-
ed as if paved with close jointed flag stones of seven,
 ten, or twenty feet square — or like a street paved
 with round smooth stones. 22nd. The wind was high and the water rough.
 We lay in the harbor till four in the afternoon,
 when we journeyed forward, rowing about eight
 miles, and after sundown, made the shore. Where
 also a boat from Niagara came with several passen-
gers on board — a clergyman, Townsend Speakman 's
 brother's six orphan children, and a Delaware In-
dian man, who could speak some English; he seem-
ed pleased with the prospect of peace; and said, he
was at no time for war. 23rd. Set out a little after daylight. The wind
 being against us, about eight o'clock we put in to
 shore a little eastward of the mouth of Genessee
 river; struck up fires and breakfasted; then passed
 on -- and arrived at the White Oak Orchard harbor
 about dark. Here we encamped amongst a number
 of Indian graves. Here also came a boat, with two
 families, removing from Genessee to Upper Canada,
 on account of the sickly situation of the Genessee
 country. In this day's journey the margin of the
 lake appeared very low, the timber small and shrub-
by, abundance of bays, and swampy ground. Bra-
doe's bay is the most beautiful of any I saw on the
 sides of the lake. 24th. The air sharp and cold, we stood up the lake
 with a fair, gentle breeze, which gradually increased,
 and carried us with velocity past Golden Hill, Cag
 Inlet, &c. over many a foaming wave, which at
 length ran so high, that the boats began to ship wa-
ter, and we put into eighteen mile creek harbor.
 Here I walked out, and met with what appeared to
 me to be a piece of antiquity. A mound fifty yards
 in circumference, raised to more than six feet high.
 On the elevation about two feet above the base, is a
 white oak tree, of two feet diameter, which I sup-
pose has originated since the formation of this artifi-
cial mount. But the design remains matter of con-
jecture. Perhaps some kind of fortification, or to
 commemorate some great achievement, or more pro-
bable the sepulchre of ancient kings. 25th. We struck our tents, and journeyed on eigh-
teen miles to the garrison of Niagara, a strong for-
tification, but a dark, noisy, confused, dirty place.
 We ferried over the river to Navy Hall, in the do-
minions of the king of Great Britain. 26th, and first of the week, we visited governor
 Simcoe , who received, us in a friendly manner. It
 was now confirmed to us, that the Indians would 
 not assemble before the 1st of 7th mo.. It proved
 a close trial, to be so long separated from the dear-
est connexions in life, and driven into the sickly
 season of the year, so that I found a necessity for
 the exercise of faith and patience. My mind was
 turned to the Lord for counsel, in this proving sea-
son. Several things revolved in my mind — whe-
ther to to return home, or to try to seek out some of
 the scattered sheep, in Canada. 27th. Governor Simcoe came to see us at our
 lodgings. He conversed with freedom and candour,
 on the subject of the treaty, — holding the posts of
 Niagara, Oswego, Detroit, &c. As also respecting
 certain laws which he wished to take place in the 
province, where Friends might be exempted from
 military requisitions. To which we replied accord-
ing to the understanding given. He is a plain man,
 and much beloved in the government. After breakfast, we moved out of our lodge in
 Newark, embarked on board the boats, and with a
 fair wind stood up the river eight miles to a landing
 below the great falls, where is a carrying place of
 eleven miles to Chipaway creek, three miles above
 the falls. The river or outlet of lake Erie, is about
 half a mile wide to this place; where it is contract-
ed to half that width. The bank from Niagara up
here, is about forty feet high, and very steep to this
 place, where the elevation is greatly increased. On
 our way, we were hailed from the bank by our be-
loved friends, John Parrish , Joseph Moore and John
 Elliott, whom we were glad to see. They returned
 to the landing, and we all dined together at Captain
 Smith's quarters, in the mess house, with five or six
 of the officers of the regiment of Queen’s rangers. 
 There being no house where we could lodge, we
 pitched our tents in a lot of one Phelps. 28th. Joseph Moore and myself went four miles
 to see Jeremiah Moore 's family. They related the
 dreadful circumstances they were reduced to, in this
 country, by scarcity of bread, and provisions of all
 kinds, in the year 1789 — when they came to an al-
lowance of one spoonful of meal per day, for one
 person — eat strawberry leaves, beech leaves, flax-
seed dried, and ground in a coffee mill — catched the
 blood of a little pig — bled the almost famished cow 
and oxen — walked twelve miles for one shive of
 bread, paid twelve shillings for twelve pounds of
 meal. One of the lads, who was hired out, carried
 his little sister two miles on his back, to let her eat
 his breakfast, and they gave him none till dinner.
 The children leaped for joy, at one robin being
 caught, out of which a whole pot of broth was made.
 They eat mustard, potatoe tops, sassafras root, and
 made tea of the tops. The relation was deeply af-
fecting. The case being general, one could not help
 another. Which brought to my mind, the many
 thankless meals, enjoyed in the land of plenty. This place is situated within four miles of the
 grand falls; the noise of which, resembles the roar-
ing of the waves of the ocean, in the time of a storm.
 One Indian and a white man, have been carried down
 this amazing cataract, within two years. The white 
man tumbled out of his canoe just at the beginning
 of the rapids, and was hurled down.
 The poor In-
dian was asleep, in his canoe, which was tied to the
 bank; it is supposed some wicked person loosed it,
 and it glided down into the rapids, when some per-
son hollowed to him; on which he stood up, struck 
 a few strokes with his paddle to no effect, then 
wrapped his head in his blanket, and laid down in
 his canoe, to meet his horrid destiny. He was found
 two miles below; but none of his bones were broken. Here I saw the skin of a porcupine, an animal
 about as large as a well grown ground hog, with a
 bushy tail, and claws like that animal. His body 
 interspersed with a vast number of stiff, pointed
 quills; which are its defence when attacked. Here
 is a beautiful odoriferous little tree, called the Balm
 of Gilead. It resembles the lombardy poplar. Here
 also, the juniper abounds. They are natives of this
 latitude. Gooseberries and currants of divers colours
 and kinds, are found here. My route in all, thus far, seven hundred and
 twenty-one miles. 29th. A wet day—which is a blessing to the earth
 and its inhabitants hereaway, as it has been exceed-
ing dry. 30th. Joseph Moore , John Elliott and myself,
 went about two and a half miles, to visit that phe-
nomenon in nature — the great Falls of Niagara,
 whose thunders, for several days, had with awful-
ness reached mine ears. When I approached this
 tremendous cataract, it truly appeared amazing, and
 with the voice of thunder, proclaimed the majesty
 of its sublime Architect. When we came to the mar-
gin of the river below the falls,
 we descended the
 almost perpendicular bank, by several windings,
 from one rock to another, and with the aid of seve-
ral Indian ladders, at length reached the surface of
the water, I suppose at least one hundred and fifty
feet below the summit. The irregular position of
 multitudes of huge rocks, which no doubt had tum-
 bled from their ancient seats, made our progress up
 toward the pitch, rough and difficult. We found
logs, pieces of canoes, &c. in abundance, twelve or
 fifteen feet above the present level of the water —
 also ducks, loons, cormorants, catfish, pickerels, and
 various kinds of fish and water fowl, which had
 been killed by the dashing of the columns of water,
 tumbling off a precipice not less than one hundred and
 twenty feet perpendicular. The rocks and stones are
 mostly excellent limestone, as are the stones in the
 banks for six or seven miles below, where, from
 every appearance, I think it is not absurd to sup-
pose the falls once were, but have worn up to the
 present barrier, where the river makes a bend, and
 the water is divided by an island; though two thirds
 of it, or more, pass on the north side of the island. I
 think it is not improbable that the lands adjoining,
derive considerable advantage to vegetation, from
 the misty vapors which arise, and are exhaled to
 the clouds, or blown by the varying winds, on the
 neighboring farms. Some of these are exceeding
 fertile; abounding with grass and grain. After spend-
ing an hour or two, almost lost in admiration, we
 ascended by the way we went down, and rode eight
 miles to the landing, where we dined at Benjamin
 Canby's. 31st. This forenoon Capt. Hendricks , Little-man,
 and three other Oneida Indians came to our camp,
 whom we were pleased to see; we refreshed them,
 and had friendly conversation, confirming the prin-
ciples of peace and good will to all men. Here we were within the sound of the martial
 trumpet, where I did adopt the Israelitish lamenta-
tion, "By Babels streams we sat and wept, when 
 we remembered Zion, and hung our harps on the
 willow trees." This afternoon, Capt. Hendricks and myself took
 boat, and were rowed eight miles down to Navy Hall,
 to see the commissioners. After some conversation
 on Indian affairs, we returned the same evening. 1st of 6th month. Used some endeavours to get our
 tents and baggage removed to Chipaway creek;
 but could not get wagons because of the late rains.
 This is a place of considerable business, which is
 principally engrossed by Hamilton, Street, and
 Phelps — the former having planted five hundred
 bushels of potatoes this year, to supply the troops.
 This morning, an Onondago chief came to our camp,
 and breakfasted with us. 2nd of the month, and first of the week. A meet-
ing being appointed about five miles distant, I set
 out on foot to attend it. On the way, in the woods,
 I looked back and at a few perches distance, were
 two Indians coming after me, on a trot — one of them
 frightfully painted from below one eye to the mid-
dle of his forehead, with a vermillion red; the other
 side, jet black. His cheek and chin under the black,
 was painted red, and the other side, under the red,
 was painted black. He had a tail of hair, and skins
 of beasts, and birds with the feathers on, which hung
 down below the calves of his legs, and blew out be-
hind him. He had his scalping knife in his hand.
 His stature was middle sized; but his visage was ex-
ceeding fierce and grim. I was quite alone. I turned
 sideways, and stood till he came up, I believe with-
out visible emotion of fear, and accosted him thus:
 Which way in such a hurry? He said, Hooch king,
 Buffaloe creek! and passed along. I went on to the
 meeting, where my companions and divers Friends,
 and other settlers in this new country, came, to the
 number of about one hundred. The meeting was
 solid and satisfactory. We went to Jeremiah Moore 's
 to dine, had a solid opportunity in his family, and
 went to our kind friend William Lundy 's, to lodge. 3rd. Walked to Squire Birch 's mills, on the ra-
pids, above the unspeakably amazing cataract; where
 I had a second view of this standing awful monu-
ment of the mighty power of Him, who created the
 heavens and the earth, the seas and fountains of wa-
ter. The rapids above, are about one mile square.
 Pleasingly grand is the prospect — the waves dash-
ing, and tumbling from rock to rock, and altering
 their appearance every moment. Here also are seen
 the misty vapours from the great falls, rising in curl-
ing columns to the clouds, resembling the smoke of
 numerous furnaces. Such are the friction of the par-
ticles of water descending, and the inconceivable
 weight of the mass of water, dashing on the rocks
 below, that it more resembles smoke than mist. —
 Our kind friend Birch has, perhaps one of the grand-
est situations for water works in the world; and I
 think, if he opens his front door, he need never pay
 the clergy for preaching. He is kind to Friends,
 having in early life, contracted an esteem for Sam-
uel Emlen at sea. Chipaway creek is about as large as Brandywine,
 and boatable fifty miles to the northward. I walked
 from Birch 's to Chipaway. Here is a block house
 and piquet, garrisoned by a number of soldiers. —
 Lodged at a public house, where we paid a shilling
 for a floor to spread our mattresses on, and other
 things equivalent 4th. Went on board one of our boats, and rowed
 eighteen miles to Fort Erie, in sight of the lake.
 — Here is a store house, garrison, &c. The water from
 Chipaway to this place, is smooth, and a good run
 for boats. Here lay three schooners, waiting a fair
 wind, bound for Detroit. We went on board the
 Dunmore that evening. Next morning, near sixty Indians came on board,
 on their way to Sandusky; among whom were Capt.
 Hendricks, Capt. John , and a number of principal
 men and warriors, much painted, ears cut, &c. 5th. Quite becalmed. I felt renewed occasion for
 the exercise of faith and patience. Expenses of
 boarding alone, twelve shillings per day. The waters of Lake Erie are three hundred feet
 higher than those of Ontario, thirty-seven miles be-
low, and are restrained from deluging the country
 by the same power which bounds "the sea by a per-
petual decree." Opposite this place, on the side of
 the United States, comes in Buffaloe creek, where
 a council of several Indian nations was held a few
 days past, preparatory to the general treaty. In the afternoon, a gentle breeze sprung up, we
 hoisted sail, and stood out into the lake. Passed
 Point Ebono, the Sugar Loaf, and Long Point on the
 north, and Presque Isle on the south. 6th. Ran all last night under a brisk quarter wind.
 This morning several of our passengers were very
 sick. I felt a little dizzy; but toward noon it subsi-
ed. This lake is, in general, about fourteen fa-
thoms water. As we navigated the middle, from
 whence we could only just discern the opposite
 shores, we could make no observations respecting
 the soil. 7th. Passed the mouth of Cuyahoga river, forty
 or fifty miles above Presque Isle. The scene rather
 dull. No variety appearing, neither fish, fowl, nor
 any thing else, save a few gulls flying this morning,
 over the waters of this formidable ocean, which has
 a barren prospect. 8th. A gentle breeze from south west, made our
 progress toward Detroit tedious, yet afforded time
 for conversation and contemplation. There being
 representatives of five different Indian nations on
 board; some French, British, German, Scotch, and
 American United States men; some soldiers, sailors,
 merchants, mechanics, and farmers. Yet, notwith-
standing all the variety of prospects and interests,
 a perfect harmony and decorum were observed. In
 the observation of which, my faith and hope were a
 little revived in the approach of that glorious day,
 when thousands and tens of thousands, yea, nations
 and kingdoms, shall repair to Zion's holy and peace-
able ensign; notwithstanding the many opposing
 strong holds of mystery Babylon, yet held up and 
maintained, in the strong reasoning part of the na-
tural, fallen wisdom of man. 9th of 6th month, and first of the week. Last
 night was a solemn, awful season. The preceding
 day was very warm. The thermometer at eighty.
 A little before sunset, the wind lulled into a per-
fect calm. A dark cloud arose south westward, and
 slowly approached us. About midnight it came on,
 with terrible wind, thunder and lightning,—to a
 humbling degree to me and the rest, more especially,
 as we had fifty barrels of gunpowder on board, and
 between eighty and ninety passengers, divers of
 whom had been fierce warriors, both Indians and 
 white men. Under every consideration, I felt my
 own righteousness as filthy rags, and dare not indulge
 a secret thought that it would be unjust if the schoo-
ner should be blown up. I had no where to rest my
 confidence, save in the unspeakable mercy of Israel's
 mighty God, by whose power we were preserved.
 The noise, and exertions of the seamen, were great.
 Their care and activity was as commendable, as it
was admirable. My spirit visited my habitation, to
 take a solemn leave of my dear companion, and ten-
derly beloved children. I felt the peace it would
 be, to yield up life at home. I remembered, I had
 been baptized into death, and brought under great
 awfulness, even unto tears and trembling, before I
 set out on this journey: and upon the whole, I was
 favoured with a good degree of quietness and resig-
nation. We now approached near the islands at the
 west end of Lake Erie. Our captain lowered sail,
 and stood eastward till morning, then put about and
 passed the first island about noon. The wind very
 unstable, frequent squalls succeeded by little breezes
 and calms. In the afternoon, came in sight of nine
 smaller, and some larger beautiful islands. This
 day we had a solid, religious opportunity on board.
 Capt. John , Capt. Hendricks , and other Indians and
 passengers, present — I believe to good satisfaction.
 The two Indian chiefs dined with us. 10th. A fair wind — stemmed the heavy current
 eighteen miles up Detroit river to the garrison. Ma-
ny plantations are on both sides of the river, mostly
 occupied by French people. On our arrival, I went
 with three other Friends, to the citadel, to produce
 our passport from Governor Simcoe to the com-
manding officer, Colonel England , a cheerful, open 
 countenanced, masculine soldier, who received us
 like a gentleman, and kindly offered civilities to
 us, — for which we acknowledged obligations to
 him. Here are fine banks, well improved. The oldest
 orchards appear luxuriant — apples, peaches, pears,
 cherries, &c. But no springs of water, nor streams
 with falls: being obliged to have recourse to wind-
mills to manufacture their grain. Of these mills
 they have a number in sight. The inhabitants are a
 mixture of French, German, English, Irish, Scotch,
 Yankees, Indians and Negroes. 11th. Held a conference with Capt. John and se-
veral other Indian chiefs and principal men; in
 which our peaceable mission was more fully explain-
ed, than heretofore. Notwithstanding our disinter-
ested, and universal principles of love and good will
 to mankind, we are sensible our path is narrow, and
 our situation delicate--the eyes of four different in-
terests being open towards us;— British, United
 States, Indians, and the reputation of our religious
society. This afternoon, walked three miles down the west
side of Detroit river, to a spring, at which I was re-
freshed, not having drank any other than river wa-
ter for ten days. On our route to the spring, we
 called at a French house, to keep out of a gust of
 rain. The family appeared polite, loving, and pleased
 to see us. On our return, we called to see an old
 noted Indian trader, Isaac Williams , who is well ac-
quainted with the Indian affairs, and their disposi-
tions. He related many alarming circumstances of
 Indian cruelty; and said they were at present more
 haughty and insolent, than heretofore. He rehear-
 sed an instance of a riot which happened that day
week, with a violent party of Indians: in which he
interfered, to prevent murder, but he got wounded
in the arm, with a scalping knife. He insinuated
doubts of our ever returning from Sandusky, unless
the commissioners submitted to the Indian demands,
 which were very high. These were also the senti-
ments of divers persons acquainted with Indians, in 
this place. All which conspired to our deep humi-
liation, and dependance on the Omnipotent Arm,
 having none other to lean to. We frequently meet Indians here, where they get
too much strong drink; in which state they discover
a very alarming, and disagreeable ferocity. Here,
 are divers persons who have been prisoners amongst
 them, some of whom recite shocking accounts of
their cruelty, in many instances; others speak more
 favourably of their treatment. However, upon the
 whole, under all the circumstances of the approach-
ing treaty, it evidently appears a serious business; and
 little, if any thing, short of offering up life, by those
who attend it. We have hitherto found very few of
 the natives, who have any knowledge of Friends, or
their principles. This evening we met Col. England , and a number
 of the officers, on the bank of the river; with whom
we had considerable conversation; in which, I hope,
we acknowledged, and supported the peaceable prin-
ciples of the gospel of our Lord and Saviour Jesus
Christ. They treated us on every occasion, like
gentlemen, in their way, — polite, and courteous to
strangers, at least to us. Col. England told us, he
had with much pains, and expense, procured more
than fifty prisoners from the Indians, clothed them,
 and forwarded them homeward; many of whom dis-
covered little sense of gratitude for the kindness;
 yet he felt a reward, as being the friend of humanity.
 At night, returned to Matthew Dobson 's, where we
 have taken lodgings. 12th. Had a solid conference with David Kenne-
dy, a half Indian, a man of learning, and a man of
influence; having been educated in Scotland, he visit-
ed London, Jamaica, &c. He lives with the Indians,
 and professes christianity; is well versed in the Scrip-
tures, and says he has initiated divers into the Chris-
tian faith, by a medium widely contrasted with our
 mode. He told us, some Indians used to mock and
 ridicule his going to church; but at a certain time,
 he undertook to drub them severely, and ordered
 them and their families to attend church in future,
 or he would be under the necessity of dealing more
 sharply with them. On which, they appeared the
 next day of public worship, and had continued stea-
dy ever since; he supposed it the most substantial
 method of making converts, as also of ending quar-
rels or disputes. To all which I opposed several
 texts out of the New Testament; to the validity of 
which he assented, and strongly avowed his friend-
ship for us, and promised to use his influence, in or-
der to open our way amongst the other nations of
 his acquaintance, which is extensive. We had to dine with us, a religious Dunker and his
 wife, settlers hereaway, with whom we had fellow-
ship. They felt near to us; which I believe was re-
ciprocal. In the afternoon, we had a visit from Capt.
 John, Young Peter , and another Indian; to whom
we read Friends' address, with which they express-
ed satisfaction, renewed their professions of friend-
ship, and wanted a copy of our epistle, which we
 waived, until the general assemblage at the great
 Council. In the evening, had a visit from two re-
spectable, intelligent British officers, who behaved
 with politeness and civility. 13th. Had an interview with Capt. Elliott , deputy
 under Col. McKee , the British superintendent of In-
dian affairs, who has been, for several weeks, enga-
ged with numerous tribes of Indians, in their coun-
cils at the rapids of Miami, preparatory to the great
 Council. Elliott has great influence with the mid-
dle hostile nations of Indians, and being an intelli-
gent person, and I thought, well disposed, might be
 extensively useful in promoting the desirable work
 of general peace. We suggested to him, as the sup-
plies for the treaty came through his hands, to guard
 against spirituous liquors being furnished. To the
 propriety of which, as well as to divers other re-
marks, he assented. We received an invitation to dine
 with the British officers at the mess house to-morrow.
 Through the variety of company and visiters, my
 mind is preserved in a quiet, humble hope, that the
 Lord is preparing our way. Here I met with a Quebec Calendar, wherein was
 inserted the names, situation, and supposed number,
 of such Indian nations as have hitherto been disco-
vered in North America — being as follows: The Choctaws or Flat-heads, and the Natches —
 situate on the Mobile, and Mississippi, 4500 The Chickasaws, 750 The Cherokees— South Carolina, 2500 The Catawbas — between N. and S. Carolina, 150 The Piantias — a wandering tribe, on both sides
 the Mississippi, 800 The Kasqueasquias, or Illinois — in general, on
 the Illinois river, and between the Wabash
 and Mississippi, 600 The Peankeshaws — on the Ouabache, 250 The Ouachtenons, do 400 The Kikapous, do 300 The Shawnese — on the Sciota, 500 The Delawares — west side Ohio, 300 The Miamis — on the Miami river, falling into
 Lake Erie — and the Miniamis, 350 The Upper Creeks, back of Georgia — the Mid-
dle Creeks, behind West Florida — and the
 Lower Creeks, in East Florida, 4000 The Canitas — on the east of the river Aliba-
mous, 700 The Alibamous — west of the Alibamous, 600 The Arkansawas — on the Arkansaw river, fall-
ing into the Mississippi, on the west side, 2000 The Anjoues — north of the Missouri, 1000 The Paddoneas — west of the Mississippi, 500 The White Panis— south of Mississippi, 2000 The Freckled Panis, do 2000 The Cansas, do 1600 The Osages, do 600 The Grand Eaux, do 1000 The Missouri — on the river Missouri, 3000 The Sioux of the Woods — towards the heads
 of the Mississippi, 1800 The Sioux of the Meadows, do do 2500 The Blancs Barbus, or White Indians with
beards, 1500 The Assiniboils— far north, near the lake of
 the same name, 1500 The Christaneaux, do do do 3000 The Ouisconsins — on a river of that name, that
falls into the Mississippi, on the east side, 550 The Mascoutins — south of Pecans Bay, 500 The Sakis, do do 400 The Michecouakis, do do 250 Folle Avoini, or the Wild Oat Indians--near
 Puans Bay, 400 The Puans — near Puans Bay, 700 The Powtowatamis — near St. Joseph's river
 and Detroit, 350 The Messesaques, or River Indians — being wan-
dering tribes on the Lakes Huron and Su-
perior, 2000 The Ottahwas — near Lake Superior and Mi-
chigan, 900 The Chipawas, do do do 5000 The Wyandots — near Lake Erie 300 The Iroquois, or Six Nations — frontiers of
 New York, 1500 The Round Headed Indians — near the head of
 Ottahwa river, 2500 The Algonquins-near the above, 300 The Nepessins, do 400 The Chalas — St. Lawrence Indians, on the
 back of Nova Scotia, 130 The Amelestes, do do do 550 The Miemacks, do do do 700 The Abenaquis, do do do 350 The Canawayhunas — near the falls of St. Lewis, 200 Total, 58680 This being the number of men fit for bearing
 arms; to which add about one-third that number, old
 and superannuated — the amount of which number
 multiplied by six, is estimated to be the whole num-
ber of men, women, and children, of the native In-
dians now discovered. This evening, had a visit from Capt. Keasy , bro-
ther to Capt. Brant , and brother-in-law to Capt. John .
 He professes Christianity — and spoke of the flood —
 also mentioned Noah’s name — and said — "good man
 build ship like house — take in two and two pi-
geons — other things — rain twelve days first — bad
 men drink grog — dance — laugh at good man — rain
 fall very heavy — bad men frightened — run up to the
 top of mountains — water rise — rise — bad people get
 canoes — come to ship — Noah say — go away — ship
 full — All drown then. Ship fall on top mountain —
 break — all come out. Great Spirit say, no more
 drown all world. Next, make all gone; fire — rivers
 come — powder, lakes too — star fall — set fire — Pooh!
 all come to Great Spirit — to all good people — say —
 come my right hand — go up there to the light — bad
 people — say — go left hand — go down dark, fire, brim-
stone — never see candle. Got this big book — come
 from old England — King George — good man. Mr.
 Steward, my father, give me sacrament — tell me,
 pray — sing. I sing hundred psalm, you please. (Then
 he tuned melodiously) And 1 am Captain Keasy ,
 Captain Brant 's brother — O yes, Captain Keasy ”-
 putting his hand on his breasts. Thus our interview
 ended. I was pleased, nay, thankful, to find his mind
 a little cultivated by a sense of right and wrong, and
 a belief in future rewards and punishments. 14th. checkPlace Breakfasted with Captain Elliott and Cap-
tain Cowen, who hospitably entertained us at table,
 also with agreeable conversation. On our return,
 we called to see about twenty Chipawa Indians, just 
 arrived from Michilimackinack, about three hun-
dred miles north west of this post, near the west
 end of Lake Huron. To which place vessels can
 sail from Fort Erie, without interruption of carry-
ing place or falls. These remote Indians were dress-
ed, and painted with black, red, green, and blue;
 having turbans round their heads, with pikes and
 prongs of skins, feathers, hair, sticks, &c. project-
ing eighteen inches out from the sides of their
 heads — frightfully painted and cut — the Squaws and
others, with tails of wild beasts passing over the top
 of their heads, and hanging down their backs. But
 my genius, pen, and even imagination in its strong-
est picturesques, must fall short of the shocking,
 striking, curious prospect of these northern inhabi-
tants of the wilderness. They had drunk rum to
 excess, before we reached them. Several were much
 disguised. The more sober shook hands, and ap-
peared friendly, to whom I gave a small present.
 Yet two very stout, grim, middle-aged men, were
 raised into rage and anger at us, loudly saying —
 shemochteman! shemochteman! I said no; not she-
mochteman — brothers, from Philadelphia. At which
 they rose higher, and more clamorous. We found
 they could understand little or none of our conver-
sation. Some of the young Indians, meanwhile,
 were singing the hair off a small animal over a fire,
 preparing for breakfast. We conjectured it to be a
 puppy. My heart felt exceeding sorrowful, and the lan-
guage of my soul was, how much owest thou unto
 thy Lord! The picture of these poor degraded ani-
mals in human shape, involved many serious consi-
derations respecting their approaching Council; where 
 would probably be many hundreds, more wild and
 ferocious than these. My mind was covered with
 lamentation respecting the cause of such degrada-
tion, which, at least in part, appears to arise from
 abandoned and profligate white people having the
 greatest intercourse with them in their trade, and
 towns; to which, stimulated by the love of money,
 they resort, at the risk of their lives — carrying their
 vices, immoralities, and bad example with them.
 These, the poor uncultivated Indians easily imbibe;
 and, taking root in a soil, adapted to receive evil
 seed, produce fruit, dreadful to behold. The greatest discouragements attending from day
 to day respecting the desired peace, arise from a
 query or doubt, that a neglect of religious duty to-
wards these poor people in earlier time, might be
 rewarded by a continuance of unrelenting, savage
 chastisement on our borders, from the old inhabitants
 of the land; whose murderous practices and their
 cruel instruments of death, and engines of destruc-
tion, I tremble to relate — such as rifles, bayonets,
 scalping knives, and tomahawks of brass and steel;
 and the bodies of some almost covered over with
 silver, tin and other plates, broaches, bobs, &c. as
 hostile ensigns. In all which, may I not say with
 sorrow and blushing, they have been equalled, if
 not exceeded, by the professed followers of the meek
 and humble Jesus, whose holy kingdom and divine
 law suffer violence arid depression, to a mournful
 degree. This day, we dined at the mess house, with about
 sixteen respectable British officers; all young gen-
tlemen from Great Britian and Ireland: several of
 whom were estated men, to a great amount. They 
 behaved with a modest civility, far exceeding my
 expectation from military characters. The enter-
tainment was luxuriously sumptuous, and hospitable,
 as to flesh, fish, fruit, and vegetables, with variety
 of wines and excellent London porter. We dined
 at four o'clock, and spent till near sunset in agree-
able conversation, on various subjects — such as reli-
gion, governments, war, peace, theatrical exhibitions;
 and, at the conclusion, they begged leave to drink
 a toast; which, out of complaisance, they dispensed
 with, except the King's health. We told them we
 could not encourage the practice, as it frequently
 proved an inlet to intemperance, and sometimes in-
toxication; which they granted — nevertheless they
 took the liberty to drink, success to the Quakers in
 the present honourable, and disinterested underta-
king. After night, a lad named Daniel Frazer , came to
 our lodgings. He told us he was taken prisoner by
 the Indians, out of Russell county in Virginia. Here
 came also, James Henry , a smart young man, a pri-
soner with the Blind Chief , near the mouth of the
 river Roosh, twelve miles from Detroit. He is adopt-
ed; which renders his case difficult. They have put
 jewels in his nose and ears, and figured him like an
 Indian. He is desirous of returning to his relations
 near Georgetown, Eastern Shore of Maryland. In
 this house is hired a young woman, whose name is
 Field, taken from Ohio, below Fort Pitt, where her
 father lived when she was taken. We have met
 with divers others, whose cases excite sympathy
 and concern, and to which attention has been paid;
 but we thought it most prudent not to make strenuous
 exertions at present, lest it might operate to our dis-
advantage at the treaty, in procuring the enlarge-
ment of prisoners more generally. 15th. Abiah Park came to see us. He is a trader
 with the Indians. He entertains doubts of a peace;
 yet says, if one can be made, it will be permanent.
 This forenoon felt easy to appoint a meeting, to be-
gin at ten o'clock to-morrow, at a shop in the ship-
yard, under the direction of William Baker , a Friend
 in principle, and cousin to George Baker of Phila-
delphia. In the evening several Indians of the Wyandot
 tribe came to our lodgings to see us. They live
about twenty miles from this place, at a town called
 Mogogam. One Samuel Sanders , a Scotchman, who
 lives with them, interpreted. They told us they
had heard their fathers say, the Quakers were hon-
est, and never wronged them; and they hoped we
 would stand for justice, and not see them wronged,
 at the treaty. We informed them we came in love to
 see them, and to renew old friendship; that the power
 did not lay with us — but we believed the commis-
sioners were sincerely disposed for peace. There
 also came to our lodgings, a party of the Chipawas —
 an old chief and several warriors, one of whom had
 a human scalp, with beautiful fair curled hair on it,
 tied to his ear. These were some of those, who, a
 day or two before, had treated us so roughly. A
 white man who stood near us at that time, and un-
derstood their language, told us they had a desire
 to have our scalps. They appear to be a terrible
 nation, fierce, insolent and warlike; and, I believe,
 exceedingly injured by their intercourse with the
 white people, especially the French, many of whom
 are little more refined than they. Their almost in-
 cessant importunity for rum, made the interview not
 so agreeable. We mostly evaded giving them liquor,
 and substituted pipes and tobacco, to put them off. 16th. First of the week. Went to meeting, where
 a large number of the inhabitants of the town, and
 military men, assembled. I believe it was a solid
 season, and truth's testimony was exalted over all
 opposition; notwithstanding rawness and dark in-
sensibility were painfully prevalent. We came to
 our lodgings, and dined with two Wyandot chiefs,
 who had been to see us the preceding evening. —
 They behaved with decency at table, equal to any
 of us; handled their knife and fork well, eat mode-
rately, drank two glasses of wine, and through the
 whole, conducted with a decorum that would do ho-
nour to hundreds of white people. We afterwards
 went down the river in Col. England 's boat, about
 six miles, to the house of Judge Powell , where we
 had appointed a meeting. The Judge and his fami-
ly being gone to England, his steward had kindly
 offered his house. A considerable number conve-
ned, and I was comforted in a belief that the ever-
lasting gospel was preached in Canada. After which
 we returned to our lodgings. 17th. This morning there were many unfavour-
able reports respecting the hostile dispositions of the
 Indians passing on to the treaty. The circumstances
 of things appear very critical, and alarming. Even
 our personal safety is called in question, and much
 doubted, unless the commissioners have very exten-
sive powers. As I was writing in the chamber
 where I lodged, two Wyandots, much in liquor, came
 up into the room, and teazed me for rum. I put
 them off. After some time they laughed, shook
 hands and departed. At which I was glad, as I was
 alone. Dined with Capt. England , Capt. Leaburn ,
 Maj. Andrews and several other military gentlemen,
 and two of their ladies. They were very courteous
 and polite. 18th. We wrote a letter two days ago, in order
 to hasten the commissioners to come forward to this
 place, being more contiguous to Sandusky, and more
 in the way of information. This morning we wrote
 a few lines to Col. McKee , at the great preparative
 council at Miami rapids, expressive of our peace-
able mission. Ten principal Indians, Senecas and Cayugas,
 came to see us. Several of them old men, with
 gray hairs, and furrowed brows; evident marks of
a round of years, attended with variety of hardships,
 exercise, sorrow and pain. Their depressed coun-
tenances awakened all the compassionate feelings of
 my mind, towards them. But my agency seemed so
 feeble, I could only retire into solemn quietude, and
 intercede the common Father, to be the comfort and
 prop of their declining years. The old Fish-carrier
 was one of the number. This day, my exercise of mind was heavy, and
 my heart sorrowful, in a feeling of the sufferings of
 the pure Seed in this place, and the cruelty and op-
pression which reign among the children of men,
 even of the most polished nations. What enormous
 salaries are given to military officers, both sea and
 land, as also to officers in civil government, who too
 generally stand opposed, with thousands of others
 in more inferior stations, to the spreading and in-
crease of the kingdom and government of the Prince
 of Peace. In a little interview with Capt. Munsey ,
 a sprightly British officer, I took the liberty to men-
tion the possibility, that when the broils in France
 should subside, the African slave trade be abolished,
 and a permanent peace concluded with our Ameri-
can Indians, all this globe might be at peace; and
 that swords (of which he had one by his side) might
 be beaten into ploughshares. He quickly replied,
 he hoped not to see such a time, as it would also
 beat up his bread and butter, (meaning his living.)
 Such are the views of too many, in this day. A middle aged Indian, of the Delaware tribe, dined
 with us. He talked a little English, by which we
 understood he was in possession of several sheets of
 ancient writings; that he had heard of Friends, and
 just faintly remembered Z. Heston and John Parrish 
 being at their town. He said there were but Buchon-
geholas, Pipe , and two other chiefs belonging to their
 nation; that we might depend, if they said peace, it
 would be peace; but if they said war, it would be
 war. Also said, we would find the middle tribes
 more faithful and manly than the Chipawas and
 Wyandots; for they were treacherous. I told him,
 they had called us Shemochteman, or Big Knife, and
 said they wanted our scalps; at which he laughed. 19th. Crossed the river, and went down the east-
ern bank four miles, to the house of John Missiner ,
 where we had a solemn season, with a number of
 his neighbours, to the contriting of the hearts of di-
vers present. Lodged with him that night. 20th. This morning had a religious opportunity
 in his family, in which, and the preceding meeting,
 dear John Parrish was favoured, in an extraordinary
 manner. After parting with them, we walked up
 the river about a mile, called at the house of Francis
 Cornwall, and had conversation with him and his
 precious wife Anna, on the subjects of water bap-
tism, the bread and wine, &c.; which they endeavour-
ed, for a while, to defend; but at length gave it up.
 We likewise had a close conversation with a French
 militia captain, on the subject of war, which we held
 to be incompatible with the purity, spirit, and pre-
cepts of the gospel. To the general scope of which,
 he assented; but alleged, that according to the oath
 of allegiance to his king, when he ordered martial
 enterprises, he must obey; and that his king must
 be responsible for what was done. We silenced his
 arguments; and proceeded to Frederick Arnold 's.
On the way, I went to visit a man who was deranged.
 He was chained in a barn. At first, he would nei-
ther look at me, nor speak to me. He was sitting
 down. I spoke to him in the fear of the Lord, and
 desired him not to be discouraged; but trust in the
 Lord; for he was come to seek and to save that which
 was lost. He then lifted up his eyes, and stared at
 me very wildly. I said, I hoped he would be bet-
ter. He said, he hoped he would. He then stood
 up on his feet, and said, my trust is in the Lord,
 and not in going into the water. I learned he had
 been pressed by some zealous Baptists to undergo that
 operation, which he could not consent to. I gave
 him some further counsel, and left him. I heard,
 next day he was so rational as to be unchained.—
 Lodged with Frederick Arnold , a long bearded Tun-
ker, an inoffensive man; but, like his brethren, and
 too many others, loves money. 21st. John Elliott and myself walked several
 miles up the river, and were ferried over it in a
 canoe, by a Frenchman. The river is about three-
 quarters of a mile wide, opposite the town. In this
 excursion I made the following observations: From Lake Erie up to this place, is eighteen
 miles. Each farm is laid out about forty perches on
 the river — mostly improved, with houses, gardens,
 and orchards; and extending back, where the land is
 level, and abounds with grass, and where hundreds
 of cattle thrive exceedingly, producing beef, butter,
 cheese, veal, &c. in plenty. Their winters are about
 four months, in which it is requisite to feed stock.
 The country, at present, is excellently adapted for
 raising live stock. The soil is mixed, and various,
 clay, gravel, sand, &c. Here are fine fields of wheat,
 and peas, but too wet for corn. Tile whole country
 is level, to a fault, without a stone, except on islands
in the mouth of the river Croeseel, and on the banks
 of the lake, which are generally limestone — these
 are monopolized by old Indian traders, and sold to
 the inhabitants, at a high rate, for the purpose of
 building their chimnies, &c. Hog Island is in sight, above the garrison. It
 appears to be well timbered. I am told it took its
 name from this circumstance; being infested with
 rattlesnakes to such a degree that people were afraid
 to enter upon it; and, as the best expedient, they
turned on it a large herd of three or four year old
 swine. In time, the hogs destroyed the reptiles so that
 it became habitable, and thence was called Hog Island. Large rafts of excellent timber are brought into
 the king's yard, in this place, from the river Lau-
trench; and some fine masts and beams, come by
 water out of lake Huron, quite through lake St. Clair.
 The changes of weather, are great and frequent
 here. There are no eels found in the waters, nor 
 rats on the land, west, or above the great Falls of
 Niagara. Here is an abundance of corn boiled in strong
 lye, and made into what we call slut hominy, to go
 in the north-west trade, an far as a place called the
 Black North, said to be eighteen hundred miles dis-
tant, now in the hands of British and Scotch mer-
chants. They go thither in batteaux. I saw a man
 who resided there three years; who says, early in
 the spring they set out with choice peltry, such as
 beaver, otter, minks, martins, &c. come to the great
 portage, where they are met by the batteaux from
 Montreal, exchange their load, and each returns just
 as winter sets in. To the north-west posts, Indians
 frequently come that never saw a white man before.
 They are clothed in buffaloe and bear skins, neatly
 softened, whitened and dressed. They are kind and
 good natured, use bows and arrows, and have no
 fire arms. They cover their cabins with large rough
 skins: as the merchants rarely purchase even deer
 skins; having such an abundance of more rich furs,
 that they cannot send the coarse skins forward. This
 trade is rich and extensive, and employs the capitals
 of many merchants, both in England and Canada.
 The great channel of this trade is down the Grand
 river from Huron lake, to which is but a short car-
rying place. An immense quantity of skins pass
 this way. The whole of the trade makes way for
 large numbers of Canadian watermen to get a living.
 The wages for them, and also for hands on land,
 average about six pounds a month. Cows sell at fif-
teen pounds a head— sheep, six dollars a piece —
 veal calves, twelve dollars each. The English and German farmers are likely to
 alter the manner of living, and customs in this place,
 for the better. The old French settlers in general
 are poor economists, and proud withal — live mise-
rably at home, yet appear grand abroad. It is said
 they live much on boiled fish, supping the broth with-
out either bread or salt. They are superstitiously reli-
gious, going to mass more than two hundred days
 in the year. They have two large worship houses
 here, and a number of crosses, set up on the banks of
 the river and other places, to evince their christianity. 22nd. Walked up the river about four miles, to a
 place called Bloody Bridge, from a contest which
 happened there between the British, Canadians, and
 Indians, where many fell. We called at a respect-
able French farmer's, who took us into a curious
 garden of fruit, flowers, &c. also into his house,
 where were pictures, representing Christ on the
 Cross, old Saints, &c. John Elliott talked French
 to them; they appeared pleased, and behaved polite-
ly. Though much apparent superstition and idola-
try are indulged amongst them, yet I hope many
 are looking beyond it to the more substantial parts
 of true worship: although I have seen them after
 mass, frolicking and horse racing in the road pass-
ing the worship house, or as it were, at the door,
 the remaining part of the day, to their reproach.
 The buildings on the banks of the river, though low,
 being mostly a story and a half, are beautiful, and
 the farms fertile — but their fuel and rails are all to
 be drawn about four miles. On our return, we fell
 in with several Chipawa camps — they had tents of
 mats curiously wrought of flags, reeds, rushes, &c.
 Their canoes were made of bark, with great skill and
 ingenuity. 23rd. First-day. Had a meeting in the sail-loft,
 with a considerable number of people. It was a time
of stripping and heavy exercise; yet I trust the gos-
pel testimony did not suffer reproach. A number of
 Indians came to see us, and behaved civilly. One
 said, he was glad at his heart to see us. 24th. Taken up in writing home. 25th. Air cold and chilly. This forenoon a wolf
 was brought to the wharf, which was shot on Hog
 Island. It is said to have been floated there from
 the main land last winter on a cake of ice. Since
 which time he has killed sixty pigs. The owner of
 the island advertised twenty dollars for his head.
 A half Indian shot him. He was higher than any
 dog I ever saw, and his teeth larger and stronger
 than a mastiff's. He was about six feet long from
 the end of the nose to the feet or paws of the hind
 legs — of a grayish colour, short, broad ears, and a 
long hairy, but not bushy, tail. This morning we received account, that a compa-
ny of Chipawa Indians who had got too much rum,
 differed in their tent on the commons. Two of them
 attacked a third, and stabbed him to death with their
 knives. A sorrowful instance of the shocking, hor-
rid effects of this man-bane, (distilled spirits.) This 
 has been the great engine, and mainspring, which
has prepared the way and led to thousands of acts of
hostility, and murders without number. It has evi-
dently appeared to me, to be the greatest obstacle in
 the way of the civilization and happiness of the In-
dian natives — the removal of which, loudly calls for
 the united exertions of our Government, and that of 
Great Britian, together with the unremitting endea-
vours of all Christians, and lovers of mankind. I
consider this important object of so great magnitude,
 as hardly to be equalled by any terrestrial achieve-
ment. Oh! that legislators would lay it more deep-
ly to heart, and the professed followers of Jesus,
 lift up a glorious ensign against this mighty destroy-
er of mankind! Instead of which, sorrow is now
added to affliction, until blood touches blood, by
 furbished swords, harnessed men and horses, glitter-
ing spears, sounding drums and trumpets — while
elated captains, colonels, and generals, glorying in
their multitude and their pomp, forget that "Tophet
is ordained of old" for those, and that they should
 descend into it — forgetting also “the sword that is
 bathed, and that shall come upon the mountains of
Idumea" — forgetting too, the God of armies, who is
able, by the diminutive fly or worm, to lay the glory
 and pomp of all nations in the dust — nor consider-
ing that it is righteousness which exalteth a nation. This town is piquetted all round. It consists of
about one hundred and fifty houses, crowded togeth-
er. The fort lays adjoining the town, on the north
 side. Watchmen are placed at four gates leading
into the town; sentinels also stand on the ramparts
 and bastions of the fortifications, who cry from one
 to another, every fifteen minutes, from nine in the
 evening, to three o'clock in the morning, all is well,
 and the last cries, all is very well. But it appeared
 a superficial sound to me. This day we dined at
 W.F.'s, which I think nothing could have induced
us to attempt, but the remembrance of our great Ex-
ample being a friend of sinners. The old man treat-
ed us with generous hospitality, which we requited
 with plain dealing. 26th. Twenty-eight Indians arrived to-day, from
 McInoi, [Michilimackinac] on their way to the
 Council. Dined at John Askin 's, one of the most
respectable merchants in this place. We were en-
tertained in a pleasing manner. His wife is a French
 woman, of an amiable, easy, graceful deportment.
 We had the company of Dr.law Wright , lately married
 to Commodore Grant 's daughter, a discreet young
woman, who was present; also Lawyer Smith , a
British merchant, John Askin 's daughter, an agree-
able young girl, and others. Our topics were, re-
signation and dependence on Divine support, in the
 use of prudent and lawful endeavours, for both spi-
ritual and temporal blessings. The origin of the
Indians, with remarks on many traces of antiquity
 found in the wilderness. From all which, with
their sacrifices; observations of moons; care for the
sepulchres, and bones of their deceased ancestors;
division into so many tribes, — the probability, and
almost certainty, was inferred, of their being the
dispersed tribes of Israel; and therefore, from Scrip-
ture testimony and prophecy (some part of which
was fulfilled, which strongly corroborated that which
 yet remained) it was inferrible that they would be
 restored, — not to a Jewish, ceremonious Israel, but to
a spiritual Israel of the circumcision, made without
 hands. It was also urged, that it was our duty to
use endeavours to promote, and pray for this, in pre-
ference to effecting their extermination. For which
 purpose, many dark and diabolical machinations are
 proposed; one of these I had recently heard of, viz.
 To take a large quantity of liquor, of which they
 are extremely fond, and infuse the strongest poison
 therein: take it into an army which should make
 feint shows, until the body of them should be col-
lected, then make a sham battle, and retreat with
 precipitation, leaving the liquor behind. The sub-
ject was closely combated, and I thought, ended in
 favor of the cause of injured humanity. After our interview closed, three of us walked out
 to speak to the Chiapas, lately arrived. We met
 five or six of them; but they could not understand
 us, neither we them, only this much, Chemochte-
man, Bostone. I offered my hand to them repeat-
edly, as also did John Parrish , which they as often
 refused. They had come down the lakes four hun-
dred miles; which shows how wide and deep the
 prejudice against our citizens has extended. 27th. Were visited at our lodgings by Dr. Wright,
 Capt. Munsey , Broadhead , Crawford , and several
 other officers, who continue very respectful to us. From this place, many hundreds of bushels of
 hominy, go yearly to McInoi, from whence it is
 forwarded to the Grand Portage; there it is parceled
 out at one bushel to a man — who is more prudent
 than to use one grain in his north-western route of
 about eighteen hundred, or as some say, two thou-
sand miles from the Grand Portage, as it is to be his
 main support in case of sickness, accidents, &c. one
 whole year. But while health remains, they substi-
tute huckleberries in their season, which they dry
 in the smoke, to take off the insipid sweet taste —
 other times, wild rye is gathered and boiled — at
 others, they catch large fish, boil them, select the
 large bones, which being pounded or beaten, are
 packed in the skin of some beast just taken off, to
 preserve for use. They kill beasts and birds, eat 
the flesh and drink the blood, without either bread
 or salt. Thus they live. The trade is principally carried on (that is, the
 labour,) by Canadians, who are quite as hardy, and
 almost as savage, as the Indians themselves. They
 are not allowed by the merchants at Montreal, to
 take into the north-west, more than one bushel, as
 their canoes must be of just such a weight as two
 men can carry on their shoulders, and will just hold
 so much, as is completely filled with goods suita-
ble for Indian trade. The company has arrived at
 great opulence by this business. They extend it by
 their accounts, so far as to mix, at times, and meet
 with merchants of the wilderness like themselves,
 employed by the Hudson Bay company. One old man
 is returned, whom John Askin says he never knew
 to deviate from the truth, as too many travellers do:
 He says he has explored those high latitudes fifty
 years, and that far beyond all buffaloes, bears, and
 large beasts of any kind; the country there will pro-
duce no kind of grain, nor large trees; but the most
 fine furs, the beaver, otter, and martin skins, always
 selling at market for a third more than middle furs.
Askin says, Alexander Henry frequently tried to
 raise corn on the banks of Lake Superior, but never
 could get one ear in perfection. All which, and
 abundance more that might be truly inserted, con-
spire to give forty degrees north latitude the prefer-
ence for human beings to breathe in. This evening,
 had a visit from Capt. John Drake , an old Guinea
 trader, now a navigator on these lakes, remarkable
 for using no kind of drink but water; yet is a healthy,
 robust man. He is employed in the north-west trade,
 and just arrived from the Falls of St. Mary , at the
 entrance into Lake Superior. On this trade, the
company has one topsail vessel, and a larger on the
stocks, ready to launch. They navigate that lake
 about four hundred miles, and some distance up a
 river, to the Grand Portage — where the goods are
taken to canoes, by about one thousand men. These
canoes run, as it is supposed, at least fifteen hundred
 miles, west-north-west — which requires them to be
 exceedingly industrious to make the post before
 winter — and when winter sets in a week or two
 sooner than common, they are frequently caught by
 the way. One McKenzie , and ten men, set out last spring
 was a year, from the Black, or by some called the
 Grand North Post, to attempt further discoveries;
 they have not been heard of since. He had been
 out once before, for twelve months; and met with
 mountains of salt ice. He now expects to be out
 three years. Some of these northern adventurers
 return, and appear as well as those who remain at
 home, feasting on delicacies. In short, the young
 men hereaway, think themselves no more accom-
plished for company or conversation, not having
 taken this journey, than our young gentlemen, not
 having taken the tour of Europe. A day or two past, we had the company of five
 Moravian Indians, whose sorrowful history deeply
 affected us. After ninety-six of their people had
been barbarously murdered at Muskingum, they
 were terrified, and driven from one place to an-
other, seven times. Their last movement was to
 the river Traunch, or Thames. They put in seventy
 acres of corn last year, which grew to good size,
 but being a little too late, was killed by the frost.
 By which means, about one hundred and forty men,
 women, and children, are under great suffering, for
 want of bread. Government furnished two hundred
 bushels of corn for their relief, which was nearly
 expended. On consideration of their being as the
 first fruits of Indian civilization, and are reputed
 very industrious; as also on consideration of the
 concern of our society for the natives of the land,
 and the business in which we were embarked, we,
 on conferring together, were united in prospect,
 that it would be right, strangers and pilgrims as we
 were, to try our credit to supply them with one
 hundred dollars worth of corn and flour. Which
 being procured from Matthew Dolson , we furnished
 them with it; for which they and their missionary,
 Sensemer , appeared thankful; and I believe it had a
 good savour amongst the people here. We wrote
a short epistle, expressive of our good wishes for,
 and kind remembrance of them, and sent by Sam.
White, John Kilbuck , and their companions, to
 David Zeisberger , to be read generally, among their
 society at home. 28th. Warm and sultry. Stayed mostly at our
 lodgings. 29th. Had a visit from a Wyandot chief, who ap-
peared to have much concern respecting the ap-
proaching treaty — also, a remembrance of former
 treaties and belts. Some long and broad belts, he
said they had, that were intended, not only to bind
 us by the hands, but clasp us by the arms, so that
 no small accidents should in future, be able to make
 a separation. And that, notwithstanding all that had
 happened, the Wyandots felt some of the old affec-
tion to possess their breasts, and he hoped we would
find it so at the general Council: but could speak for
none but themselves. We desired our interpreter,
 J. Heckewelder , to assure him we possessed the same
love and friendship for them, and for all other Indians,
 that we, or our forefathers, ever did — that our prin-
ciples had always restrained us from making war
against them. But when we believed the govern-
ment was disposed to make peace with them, on
principles of justice, we were willing to leave our
homes and near connexions, and at a great expense,
undertake a long and hazardous journey, to endea-
vour to promote it, and to be present at the conclu-
ding of so good a work. On delivery of which, he
said, he knew long ago we did not fight, but were
for peace. He then got up, and shook hands with
Friends, then sat down, and spoke in substance as fol-
lows: That as we had come a long journey, and were
all preserved in health, it was evident the Great
Spirit was pleased with our coming; and he hoped
some good would be done, and that the Great Spirit
would bring us home in the same good health, with
peace and joy. To which we replied, we were glad
of such an opportunity to talk with him, and if the
great and good work of peace could be effected, we
hoped we should return home with joy and peace;
which was all the reward we wanted or looked for.
 He asked whether it would be disagreeable, if he 
 was to come and dine with us, to which we invited
him. We were also visited this morning by Abram ,
 Katherine his wife, Rebekah and Mary , his daugh-
ters. They live at Miami Rapids, are Mohickons,
and appear much civilized. Also, some Shawnee
women, one a widow, who, because of her situation,
 had taken off her bobs, jewels, and trinkets, with
which the others shone with splendor, having massy
plates of silver about them, I have no doubt, to an
 amount that would have clothed them in silk and
velvet. Had it not been for the profuse introduction
of distilled spirits amongst these people, and the
frauds in consequence of it,
 imposed upon them, al-
so the ravages and depredations of war, with multi-
plied murders and thefts, they would at this day have
been a very wealthy people in silver and gold, cat-
tle and horses. But the reverse is, at present, their
sorrowful situation, I fear to our condemnation. The
history of their barbarity, treachery, and breach of
faith to the white people, and to one another, which
we have heard rehearsed by people well acquainted
with facts, since we arrived here, would be painful,
tedious, and indeed too shocking to relate. These
circumstances almost stagger the faith of their best
friends. Even one of the Moravian missionaries
said, that even if peace should be concluded, it
would not last long, until they were further chas-
tised. John Parrish asked, by what means? Did
he mean the sword? It was answered, yes — not
until they were convinced the United States were
too powerful for them, and able to subject them. —
These being the sentiments of those who had lived
long among them, solely to promote peace, and the
 principles of the gospel, proved very discouraging
to us. They also pronounced it impossible to in-
struct them in the principles of justice, equity, and
government; which I was not willing to admit. We had a visit to-day from Nathan Williams , an
 intelligent man, especially in Indian affairs, which
he has been intimately acquainted with. He, in a
friendly manner, suggested fears that we would be
 either killed, or kept as hostages, at the ensuing
Council. And truly I am not astonished at their ideas,
considering the spectacles of human misery they are
 almost daily presented with, and the rumors they
hear — where tribes of Indian warriors have so fre-
quently passed, with their disconsolate prisoners;
and with poles stuck up in the front of their canoes,
some with fifteen, others with thirty scalps suspend-
ed on them, in trophy of their courage and victory.
Though it must be said in honour of British huma-
nity, and commendation of this government, Upper
Canada, and its truly respectable and generous offi-
cers, they have interfered to the relief of scores of
prisoners, and obtained their redemption at a great
price. Divers of these we have met with, and they
appeared as the very outcasts of England and Ire-
land, who, as Col. England , and other officers, told
me, hardly had the manners to acknowledge the
kindness, though in some instances it cost one hun-
dred pounds. But in case of a real American, they
never begrudged it. This has been a high day at the Roman chapel;
being canonized in honour of St. Peter. They rung
 the bells, and it is said, carried about the host. At
ten, they assembled at the chapel in great numbers,
men, women, and children. Some kneeled, and ma-
ny sung aloud. I saw them through the windows,
from our lodging. Many of them appeared sincere.
But oh! the clouds of lifeless ceremonies, of images,
 pictures, water, wine, wafers; schemes of human
policy and earthly wisdom, operating as so many
veils which obscure the inshining of the rays of the
sun of righteousness, darkening counsel, to a sorrow-
ful degree, often amongst men in eminent stations.
Indeed, the veil of the covering, spread over all na-
tions, is only destroyed in proportion as we approach,
and ascend the Lord's peaceable, holy mountain, in
the purity of his saints, as little children, — where,
without cloud of ceremony, or mist of darkness or
unbelief, their angels do behold the face or appear-
ance of their Father in heaven, — they behold his
universal love, — in his pure fear, — in the awful at-
tributes of his righteous judgments, — and incompre-
hensible mercies, — more than heart can think, or
tongue can speak, — and, in abasement, they bow be-
fore the name of the Lord Jehovah, in whom sure-
ly, is everlasting strength, and to whom, I desire to
commit my cause, and commend my soul, with my
dear companion, and our tender babes, if we should
never more meet in this vale of tribulation. Last night, about eleven o'clock, five or six guns
went off smartly one after another. The report
sounded unpleasant, especially, anticipating if it
should so happen at Sandusky, how it would pro-
bably alarm. I understand it was at some wolves,
which had destroyed a neighbour's sheep. 30th. We were visited by a principal man of the
 Wyandots, called the Blind Chief , with his nephew,
grand-son, and great-grand-son, a likely lad of twelve
years old. They were well dressed, and appeared
 friendly. We informed them, by an interpreter, of
our friendly motives in this visit, and explained our
uniform peaceable principles and practice, for more
than one hundred years; and that we wished to pro-
mote peace in our country. He told us, eight of
their principal men were gone to the Council at
 Miami Rapids, with pacific views and intentions.
They took leave of us in a decent, respectable man-
ner. This day, we had two meetings in the king's sail-
loft, largely attended by citizens, officers, and sol-
diers, of Detroit, which, though deeply exercising,
wading us through mire, and dirt, and rubbish, yet
were to a good degree, satisfactory. 1st of 7th mo. Breakfasted at Capt. Elliott 's: af-
terwards, attended the burial of Isidore Shone , at
the Roman chapel, where the priest in his pontifical
robes, was preceded by a man bearing on an ensign
like a halbert, a large cross; and attended by singers,
and two little lads, each with a candle. They, with
the priest and singers, were clothed in black petti-
coats, and covered over the arms and shoulders with
a white surplice, which reached down to the knee.
When the coffin, which was covered with a black
pall with costly fringe, approached the threshold of
the chapel, the bearers made a small halt, the priest
turned round with a brush in his hand, and sprinkled
water on the apparatus about the deceased. I did
not go inside of the house, but saw numbers of light-
ed candles burning in it; which made but a feint
light, as the sun shone bright, and the day was ex-
ceeding warm. Notwithstanding which, the eccle-
siastical part of the procession went bare-headed,
 and very slow, muttering, or rather growling, a sen-
tence or two of Latin, over and over, all the way.
Indeed the whole of this religious parade, appeared
to have more of Jewish ceremony, or Gentile super-
stition in it, than Christian simplicity or gravity. —
They deposited the poor tabernacle under the floor,
 rung the bells, sung aloud, made their sanctum sanc-
torum resound, and then departed. Numbers of them
come to mass on first-day, eight or ten miles, just
 step in, and (they say) rhyme over their paternoster,
dip their finger into the font, cross themselves, and
out again, to drink and frolic. 2nd. I went on board the Ottoway, Capt. Cowan ,
 just arrived from Fort Erie, in hopes of hearing from
home; in which I was disappointed. I found eigh-
teen Oneida Indians on board, with whom I had
 some conversation. The captain informed me, he
 had put sixty on shore at the mouth of the Miami,
 on their way to the Rapids, where, we are inform-
ed, twelve hundred Indians are assembled. This
day we received a letter from Colonel McKee , con-
taining friendly sentiments, and an assurance that
we should have timely notice of the opening of the
treaty. We also received one from a young man on
board the Chipaway, informing that Colonel Butler ,
 who was passenger with his Indians on board Capt.
 Cowan's vessel, came on board their vessel, and in
conversation in a select company, where he had no
 suspicion, expressed, that if the commissioners should
propose, or even hint any other terms than what
were concluded upon by the Indians, he would not
think it strange, if every person from the colonies,
comissioners, Quakers, and all, should be sacrificed
on the spot; for they know no distinction, but their
own people. This, the young man communicated to 
 us out of pure friendship, having heard it himself:
which we treasured up at present. But truly, the
 pressure of murdering, dark, blood-thirsty spirits,
from day to day, is exceeding heavy; always re-
quiring us to watch and pray, that we may be fur-
nished with the whole armour of light. 3rd. Col. England came to visit us. We went to
see his garden — in the interview, he showed every
mark of respect to Friends, and desired us as often
 as we wished, to retire into his arbours in the heat
of the day. We acknowledged his kindness, and
 went to our lodgings to dine, where we had the
company of a young Shawnese chief. He was neat-
ly dressed in Indian style. I computed he had, at
least, one thousand silver broaches stuck on a new
silk hunting shirt. He behaved at table with great
gentility. 4th. Fourteen Indians came to see us. They ap-
peared friendly. The weather exceeding warm. Al-
though we are well supplied with provisions, yet,
the water being all brought from the river, and
standing in a tierce in the sunshine, makes our drink
disagreeable. This, with a host of flies by day, and
fleas and bugs by night, added to our state of sus-
pense, required some fortitude and patience to keep
our post, without looking back, or meditating an
escape. 5th. Had some conversation with an intelligent
 woman, who had been taken prisoner in Kentucky,
 and separated from her husband and nine children.
 All had been favoured to meet again except one,
which she says is now in Kentucky. She says, three
hundred and ninety-five persons were taken, and
scattered through the wilderness at the time they
 were, fourteen years ago. Such a situation, contrast-
ed with a land of peace, and the security of life,
liberty, and property, may enable us to make some
estimate of the blessings we enjoy, and the princi-
ples which lead to a permanent security of them. This morning the Ottoway, Capt. Cowan , sailed
 for Fort Erie, to go by the way of Miami Bay, hav-
ing provisions on board for McKee and the Indians
at the Rapids. With whom Capt. Elliott , deputy
Indian agent for the British, embarked, to join
 McKee at the council. We acquainted him repeat-
edly with our design in coming to this country, and
our prospects of the importance of the business in
agitation, and engaged him to use his influence as
speedily as possible, to open the way for a treaty. I
sent by this vessel some intelligence to Philadelphia,
and sailed up the river past Hog Island and Pearl
Island, into the lower end of Lake St. Clair, which
is about thirty-six miles long, and eighteen broad.
After taking a prospect of Gross Point, the residence
of Commodore Grant , viewed N. Williams ’s stone
wind mill, dined at his house, and returned eight or
nine miles to our lodgings. William Savery and
William Hartshorn , in our absence, were visited by
 a Shawnese warrior, who announced to them what had
before been frequently suggested to us by divers per-
sons, that if the commissioners did not immediately
agree, that all the land west of the Ohio, should be
evacuated, and given up by the United States, or
even hinted any thing to the contrary, by offering
gifts or money as purchase, of which they under-
stood they had brought abundance with them, that
none of them, or their company, would ever go off
the ground alive — for their fathers, who are now all
gone, had sold lands for knives, broaches, and rum, till
they were now driven almost to the sun-setting, where
they were determined to make a stand. He com-
plained of the ruinous consequences of the introduc-
tion of spirituous liquors amongst their fathers, say-
ing, at first, they called it bitter water, and some,
fiery water. But by repeated offers of it to them,
they at length fell in with it, to their hurt in gene-
ral. He also informed, that four days before he left
the Rapids, a deputation of two chiefs of each nation
had embarked to meet the commissioners at Niaga-
ra, to let them know the outlines of their conclusions,
and that if the white people would settle to the banks
of Ohio, on the east side, and agree that the river
should be the line, they would be glad, and take them
by the hand, and call them brothers. All which intel-
ligence, he said, might be depended on as true. Our
apprehensions that the commissioners were vested
 with no such powers, and that the government had
no such intentions, tended to thicken the cloud which
seems impending over this land; as the seeds of de-
struction are sowing in a soil, prepared to produce
shocking scenes. This same Indian, getting raised with strong drink
in the afternoon, made a stroke with his tomahawk
at one Sylvester Ash , an interpreter, who had long
resided with the Shawnese; Ash ’s exertions pre-
vented his killing him; he then knocked off our
landlord's hat, who struck him several hard blows,
and turned him out of the house. Capt. Munsey ,
being present, sent for two soldiers, who put him
out of the garrison. He was much enraged. Upon
the whole, all things conspire to increase the gloom,
and assure us that nothing short of wisdom from on
high will do for us to lean to. 6th. My mind was deeply exercised with a con-
sideration, how the way may open in this dark land,
to lift up our testimony for the excellency of the
government of Christ, our Redeemer, in these hea-
then regions of both white and red people. The
Felicity is just arrived from the Miami, and con-
firms the account of the Indian deputation being
gone to meet the commissioners at Niagara, accom-
panied by Col. Butler and Simon Girty . 7th. First of the week. Held a meeting in the
sail-loft, which was in a good degree comfortable
and satisfactory. Just arrived from the Rapids, Capt.
John, David Kennedy , and Mohican Samuel , by
 whom we received a letter from Capt. Hendricks ,
importing, twenty nations were then assembled; that
there were runners sent to bring forward the Poto-
watomie chiefs; that in a few days, they should move
to Sandusky, and that a desire for peace was gaining
ground amongst them. This account, from a man
in whom we had confidence, was encouraging to us. In the afternoon, we held a meeting for worship
at a mill, at the river Ruzche, about five miles from
Detroit, with a considerable number of middle aged
 and young people, to the peace of our minds. Re-
turned in the evening, they having sent up horses
to bring us down and carry us back. 8th. Had an interview with David Kennedy , a
learned, intelligent man, just returned with Capt.
John from the Rapids. He informs, there are a nu-
merous host of Indians there, and that the general
sentiments were looking towards peace; yet the
young Shawnese were high, and rough in their
dispositions, especially the warriors. We also had
an opportunity with about ten or twelve Indians of
the Six Nations, desiring them to use their influence
to promote the work of peace; which they appeared
to unite with. This forenoon we wrote to Capt. Hendricks by
Samuel, also sent him some money (five dollars) for
which he wrote. We have lately understood that
hostilities have commenced between the Chipawas
 and Sioux of the Meadows, and Sioux of the Woods,
against each other. They are powerful nations. This day was another interment at the Roman
chapel, of a man, said to be one hundred and fifteen
years old. It was, as usual, attended with abundance
of Romish pomp and superstition. The house was
wonderfully replenished with lighted candles, which,
in meridian sunshine, appeared to reflect no light at
 all; but rather a gloom — which is truly the case with
spiritual sunshine, or gospel light. It all appeared
dark. 9th. I went to visit Col. England , where I met
Capt. Blue Jacket , a chief warrior among the Dela-
wares, who, it is said, was in command at General
St. Clair's defeat. He was dressed in scarlet, with
gold tassels, and a laced hat. A brave, masculine
 figure of a man. I spoke to him by an interpreter,
letting him know I was one of the people called
Quakers, who were men of peace, and that we were
come to try to heal, and make peace. He replied,
he had heard of Quakers, and that they were harm-
less people, and did not fight. He was going to
Montreal; but had given his opinion before he came
away, and hoped matters would be settled.
We also had a visit to-day from several Shawnese.
One of them was a middle-aged man, the most solid
countenanced I had seen amongst them. We spoke
to him by an interpreter, and let him know who
we were, and what our views were in coming; and
also our apprehensions of the sincerity of the go-
vernment, in the present embassy. With which he
appeared pleased, and said, he heartily wished we
might get through with the work of peace, that the
young and active part of the Indian nations might
know what to do, as it concerned them most, as the
old ones had not long to live. He said he had heard
of our people, that we did justly, and did not fight,
and that he was glad to be with us. After drinking
a glass or two of wine, he wished us well, and de-
parted. In my interview with Col. England , I was pre-
sented with a sketch of the great falls, curiously ta-
ken by Capt. Steel , who is an artist at such designs.
I also had an account to-day, from a man employed
at the Grand Portage. It is nine miles over, and
three bundles of seventy pounds each, is the stipula-
ted burden for each man to carry that distance. But
 some will carry more, and ascend and descend two
mountains on the way. Two men carry the canoe
on their shoulders, until the blood will run down
on green hands; but at length, the skin becomes
hard as a bullock's neck, accustomed to the yoke. Thus they carry and row, over ninety carrying
places, and as many creeks, puddles, little lakes,
and rivers, for more than one thousand miles be-
yond the Grand Portage. 10th. Capt. Blue Jacket came to see us. We had
a friendly interview with him. He is married to a 
French merchant's daughter, late of this place, now
deceased. Two Cayugas also visited us. But we
painfully feel the want of suitable interpreters. —
Many understand their language; but our sentiments
being generally peaceful, serious, and religious, so
opposite to those held by persons qualified to serve
us, that what they delivered, appeared to be with
shame and reluctance. This put it out of our power
fully to relieve our minds. My mental powers often
centred in secret intercession to the Preparer of
hearts, that the travail of my spirit might be con-
veyed through such aqueducts, to their advantage
and edification, as may best consist with his wisdom
and power. As our minds were bowed, and patient-
ly waded under it, there evidently appeared a seri-
ousness at times to impress their countenances. —
 Last evening we received a grateful letter from the
 Moravian Indians. We had interviews to-day with several Indians,
Munseys, Shawnese, and Delawares, to some satis-
faction. They appeared pleased with our motives
in coming. This afternoon, I visited a young woman
educated at Newport, Rhode Island. Her father's
name, William Foster . She went from home, con-
trary to her father's will, with one Molay, an offi-
cer in St Clair ’s army. He was killed in the defeat
of 1790, and she taken prisoner by the Indians, who
kept her eleven months. She then got off, and has
since lived in Detroit, and by her conduct, evinced
that she was not thankful enough for the many mer-
cies, and great deliverances wrought for her. Lat-
terly she has been taken with epileptic fits, of which
she frequently has divers in a day. The intervals of
health are filled with bemoanings and cries for mer-
cy. Notwithstanding it appeared to me to be the
chastening hand of judgment laid upon her, yet my
sympathy was touched, to consider if she was my
child, poor and quite destitute of friends able to
comfort her, how should I feel. Oh! saith my soul,
that the multiplied mournful instances recited in the
catalogue of rebellion and disobedience to parents,
might have the happy effect to induce young people,
early to seek the kingdom of God, and his righteous-
ness: so would they be preserved out of snares, temp-
tations, and beds of anguish and sorrow, the sure
rewards of sin and disobedience. 11th. Dined at Abbott’s, a Detroit merchant,
 with all our company, except Joseph Moore . Indian
affairs was the topic. In the course of the conver-
sation, I felt some zeal for the testimony to arise;
under which I spoke plainly to divers points, and
some persons present urged the necessity of whip-
ping, or further chastising the Indians, and the im-
possibility of effecting their reformation without it. 12th. Went down the river four miles, and paid
 three or four little visits to some friendly people.
This afternoon, a vessel arrived from Fort Erie,
bringing accounts that the Indian deputation had ar-
rived there, and the commissioners were returned
to Niagara. Which accounts, with no way opening
as yet, to see the Indians at the Rapids, and no let-
ters from Philadelphia, make our situation here, sin-
gularly trying. 13th. A small vessel arrived from Fort Erie,
which brought letters from my wife, M. Miller ,
brother J. L. and Jonathan and Rumford Dawes ,
all fraught with love, and instructive communication.
This was a joyous feast to my mind, and as marrow
 to my bones, ministering much consolation and en-
couragement, and animating with increasing ferven-
cy and dedication, to encounter the difficulties of our
wilderness journey, with the varied conflicts and
perils attendant thereon. We also received three
general epistles, one from James Pemberton , one
from John Pemberton , and one from Henry Drink-
er, all dated about 6th of 6th mo. 1793, which were
mutually comforting and strengthening, to our little
band. To find and feel the help, sympathy, and
travail of the spirits of our friends at home, was like
the consecrating oil to each of us. This vessel also
brought a letter to us from Col. Pickering , announ-
cing the arrival of the Indian deputation, just as they
were about to embark — the commissioners were re-
quested to return to Navy Hall, to have a short
speech in the audience of Gov. Simcoe . As it was
to be a short conference, they desired our further
patience, and hoped to see us in a few days. This
intelligence, after five weeks suspense, was not very
pleasant. 14th. First of the week. Held a public meeting
for worship in the ship-yard, which was attended by
a large number of people, divers of whom are near-
ly attached to us. It was a solid, quiet season. But
through ignorance of the divine principle, through
 their inattention to it, and want of faith in it, truth,
in this Babylonish land, does not rise into that do-
minion, as I have felt it in some other places. I had an opportunity of conversing with Simon
 Girty's wife, who seems an inoffensive woman. She
had been long a prisoner amongst the Indians. She
gave an account of many of their method of torture
on their enemies. She says they used frequently
 to speak of the Quakers in the nations, as a people
that did not go to war. Capt. Elliott has just ar-
rived from the Rapids, but nothing further has yet
transpired. 15th. Had an interview with Elliott ; he appears
much reserved. Our anxious state of suspense con-
tinues. Being apprehensive of the Indian embassy
to the commissioners, preventing the proposed trea-
ty, we wrote to Col. McKee , also a short epistle to
the Indians, to be in readiness to forward by the first
opportunity. Here we observed a species of Indian slaves, call-
ed Pawneys, or Punins, who are captives, chiefly
taken by the Chipawas, from the Suez, (Sioux) or
Pawney nations. But it is sorrowful to think, that
in a British government so famed for liberty, they,
and a number of the African race, are held in bon-
dage during life. This day, I walked out into the woods, a mile and
a half; when my further excursion was prevented
by swamps, bogs, and marshes. In my route, I found
stones in divers places, such as are observed on the
margin of the lake. The land in general is almost
sunk under water. My mind was strongly impress-
ed with a belief, that lakes Huron, St. Clair, Erie, and
Michigan were once united, and the tens of thou-
sands of acres, of low adjacent land, were all over-
flowed. By the breaking and wearing away of the
great falls, as mentioned before, the water has lower-
ed to the present surface: and as cultivation increases,
I have no doubt, the country will be improved by a
further diminution of the marvellous cataract. The
progress of population, at present, is obstructed, not
only by the wet, unhealthy state of the country, but
also by other circumstances: viz. one-seventh of the
whole country is reserved for the crown, and one-
seventh for the episcopal clergy: also by an existing
law of old Canada, all real estates, though sold seven
 times in seven years, must be sold at the chapel door,
 mostly on first day afternoon, one-ninth whereof
goes to the Roman church. By this means, some
congregations, especially in Montreal and Quebec,
have become immensely rich, and enabled to carry
on their idolatrous pomp and parade of worship, so
as to make the world wonder. But as light is rising,
a necessary reform is apprehended to be not far dis-
tant. 16th. Had a solid interview with Elliott , deputy
agent of Indian affairs for the British. He is pre-
paring to return to the Indian council at the Rapids.
 We proposed to him, whether there would be any
impropriety in our going with him. To which he
replied, as his sentiment, that where the Indians
were now assembled, was their own council ground,
and on a path that was not to be trod in, but by war-
riors: and therefore, it was his opinion, it would not
be eligible to move that way at present. We let
him know our prospects were, that every assistance
from the British government, towards negociating a
peace with the Indians, would be afforded. He gave
us to understand, the Indians were generally acquaint-
ed with our being here, and our views towards them,
and hoped, on the return of the Indian embassy,
some way would open for our relief. Finding no
way to have an opportunity with them collectively,
we concluded to write again to the agent, McKee ,
 and also to the Indians; which Elliott assured us
should be fully and fairly interpreted to them. With
this we were for the present obliged to rest satisfied,
in our probationary tribulated allotment. I can truly
say, I travailed with many pangs to be delivered,
with breathings to Him who alone can help and in-
terpose, when all human aid is utterly unavailing. It is wheat harvest; the grain is well filled; but in
many places, it is much injured by a kind of smut,
or blast. The grain is as large as good wheat, but
 appears of a dusky color; and being bruised, or cut
in two, the contents are like soot, black and dusty.
Sometimes ten blasted ears for one sound one. In
 divers instances, wheat fields are rendered entirely
useless. When one-half, or one-third, or even one-
tenth, is smutted wheat, it spoils the whole. The
farmer is obliged to wash all his wheat, through
three or four waters, before it is fit for bread. 17th. No admission being apparent into the In-
dian country, as the best expedient, we concluded
to send by Capt. Elliott , Friends' Address, accompa-
nied by a short epistle of our own, to the Indians:
also, a letter to Col. McKee . We remain daily ex-
ercised in a patient, fervent travail, that the Supreme
Controller of events, may bring to pass his hidden
purposes, according to his own sacred determination,
to the exaltation of his own great name, in these
dark regions of violence, murder, and licentiousness
of almost every kind. The awful language of the
Most High to a backsliding people formerly, has
frequently impressed my mind, as applicable to the
inhabitants of these countries, with some few ex-
ceptions, “My soul loathed them, and their souls
abhorred me.” This day a cannon was fired, for the direction of a
man supposed to be lost in the woods. It frequent-
ly happens, that people get bewildered in this coun-
try, and sometimes lost, especially in cloudy wea-
ther. If they go but one mile in the woods, such is
the sameness of soil, timber, &c. with no mountains,
and few streams to guide them, they frequently take
the opposite direction from the settlement, and get
into difficulty. We have lately heard of the arrival of a number
of Creek and cherokee Indians, in the neighbour-
hood of the Indian council; we fear, with views not
friendly to a peaceable accommodation of matters
with the western Indians. We have heard, hostili-
ties between them and the whites, have been renew-
ed to the southward. Great is the opposition, at
present, in the earth, to the peaceable kingdom of
 Christ, our Redeemer. Under a sense of which, my
spirit bows with intercession, that Israel may abide
in their tents, where they will be covered, as under
the hollow of his divine hand, until his indignation
pass over. 18th. I had an interview with Capt. George Wel-
bank, who appeared an intelligent, cool, dispassion-
ate man. He came with a detachment of Cherokee
and Creek Indians, from their towns in the southern
territory, he says, more than a thousand miles from
 hence in a straight line; and that they were ninety
days on their journey. His principal business ap-
peared to be with Col. England , who immediately
gave orders for the sloop Felicity to sail, with Capt.
Welbank on board, to Fort Erie, on the way to Gov.
 Simcoe. Large rolls of intelligence were despatched
by him, containing, as we supposed, matters of im-
portance. Shortly before, Col. England assured our
friends, the Felicity was detained in the harbor on 
 purpose to transport us to Sandusky, or Fort Erie,
as was most eligible on the shortest notice. In conversation with Capt. Welbank , on the situ-
ation of Indian affairs to the southward, with which
he discovered extensive knowledge, he asserted as
follows: — That in the year 1791, a treaty was held
with the southern Indians, negociated on behalf of
the United States, by a person who made out the
articles of the treaty in writing, wherein he inserted
the free navigation of the Cherokee river, without
their knowledge, and bribed the interpreter to read,
ten miles round Nashville village, where forty was
 inserted. There was a large extent of country, for
which the natives required three thousand dollars
per annum, but he assured them his power would
not permit him to go so high; but for the present,
he would insure two thousand dollars, and had no
doubt of obtaining the whole sum, by an application
to Congress. But in the article it was read, two
thousand dollars, where one thousand only was en-
tered. And after all, the survey far exceeded the
limits of the land agreed on. Of which grievances,
the bloody fellow, Notawasky , Joberson , and Prince
of Eastern Airy, came to Congress for redress; they
were politely received, and assured justice should
 take place. On the faith of which, they returned,
and made report to their people, who rested satisfied,
until their hopes of redress were laid waste, by Spen-
cer and others coming over the dividing ridge, be-
tween Holstein and Tennessee rivers, (which was the
boundary prescribed) building mills, and piqueting
forts, on the waters of the Tennessee. Capt. Wel-
bank says, the Indians have applied to the Spaniards,
and received assurances they shall be supplied with 
 necessaries. There were some reasons for believing
Capt. Welbank was now here, to negociate a friend-
ship with the British. This afternoon, John Elliott and myself, walked
three or four miles, to see sixteen Oneida Indians,
 amongst whom are several principal men, George
Duckwell, Abram , &c. We had some conversation
 with them on the advantages of peace, and the bless-
ings consequent on being redeemed out of the spirit
of war. We also entered a little into the subjects
 of the existing uneasiness between the Indians and
our government. Duckwell , an old man, said, the
dispute was about lands west of the Ohio — that he
was at a treaty, held at Fort Stanwix, twenty-four
years ago, which was a general treaty with all the
tribes; and then, the Ohio was agreed to be the
boundary. Since which time, he knew of no treaty,
where the chiefs who had a right to sell lands, were
collected. I find the Six Nations claim a kind of
sovereignty over the soil, to a great extent south-
ward. Abram said, he married his wife amongst the
Wyandots, and some years ago, they made a visit
to see her relations, "and I say, brothers, what you
always go to war — fight 'mericas? They say — if
'mericas love peace, give us our lands — stay that
 side 'hio — shake hands — call brothers; — but if ‘me-
ricas come take our country, where deer plenty,
turkeys, wild cows — good land — then war — always
 war." We told him, we never went to war, nor
our friends, for one hundred and fifty years past —
that all men, of all nations, white, red, and black,
were our brothers — that one Great Spirit made us
all, and was father of us all. They said, Ouch, that
is good, very good. 19th. Staid mostly at our lodgings, writing, and
conversing with some intelligent travellers. One
of them related a conversation between one Frobish-
er, a merchant in the north-west trade, when at the
Grand Portage, west end of Lake Superior, and an
old Indian from the north-west; which so much co-
incided with my own sentiments, that I note it.
Frobisher was inquiring after the curiosities of the
 northern clime, which the Indian related as far as
he had travelled — but added, that younger Indians,
who had travelled further north-west, had seen some
things still more wonderful. Frobisher asked him,
if he did not think some parts of their relation un-
true? The old Indian replied, no; it is not possible
it can be lies, for they had never seen a white man
in their lives! A severe reflection on Christians, so
called. 20th. A woman was interred at the Roman cha-
pel, with the usual pomp, parade, and superstition.
Candles burning in clear sunshine — host and holy
water displayed — black pall surplices. All the males
 bare-headed, walking slowly — the sexton going be-
fore, the host-bearer next, with a boy on each side,
carrying lighted candles. Then the priest, in his
 pontifical robes, with a boy before him, with a brass
laver or font, containing the consecrated water, with
a brush in it. On each side of the priest were sing-
ers, dolefully humming Latin. The priest held a
book in his hand, which he sometimes opened, and
then sung Latin — several times sprinkling the bier
and pall with the water. The singers and boys bear-
ing the candlesticks and laver, as also those who
supported the bier, were clothed outside with black.
The bells rung frequently. Indeed, the whole pro-
 cession appeared solemnly dark. When they came
to the grave, which was about two and a half feet
deep, in which was much water, the priest took the
brush, and added a little more — they laid down the
coffin, and for a time dolefully hummed more Latin.
During which, the people generally went on their
knees. When that was over, the people departed,
leaving the sexton to fill up the grave alone. I am
told the water rises so near the surface of the ground
in these countries, that it is difficult to bury a corpse
so deep, but what the wolves can scratch down to
 it. As they often bury without coffins, many who
are killed in battle in the woods, and others murder-
ed in cold blood and left above ground, the wolves
have devoured them. It is said, these animals have
become so fierce and fond of human flesh, that they
have attacked, and destroyed people in the woods.
The Indians used to call them brothers, and would
not kill them; but one or two of their people having
been killed by those creatures, the Indians have
now proclaimed war against them, killing all they
can. This low, level country, abounds with sugar-trees
to such a degree, that if the manufactory of sugar
was promoted extensively in this place, it might be
ranked among the exports of North America. The
Indians, who have kettles suitable for the business,
make large quantities in the spring of the year, and
sell it as low as six-pence per pound, and under.
Some have been so fraudulent, as to mix sand with
it, and when detected, endeavoured to justify them-
selves, by the example of the white people mixing
water with the rum, sold to them. A practice, very
common amongst the rum sellers, who say, rum
 hurts them, and the less they get the better for them.
It is, therefore, evident, that in proportion to their
intercourse with the whites, they have increased in
treachery, fraud, drunkenness, and licentiousness of
every kind; and appear, at present, not unlikely to
be a rod prepared for our close chastisement. Being in their nature, or by habit, unfeeling and
ferocious, I have often in this journey, had my feel-
ings wounded, by seeing old gray-headed women,
carrying heavy burdens of skins, venison, brooms,
matchcoats, &c. with large drops of sweat rolling
from their aged brows; when several sprightly young
 and middle-aged men, went lightly on before them,
with nothing to carry but their clothes, tomahawk,
and scalping knife, dangling by their thigh. 21st. Last evening, I had an account from a man
 who came from the Glades up the Miami-of-the-lake,
that the Creek and Cherokee Indians passed through
the Delaware towns there, and produced a piece of
tobacco died red, which was received as the decla-
ration of war against the United States — that the
white prisoners were very numerous amongst the
Indians — and that, at the Rapids, as he came along,
 he saw a beautiful woman, well dressed, just brought
in. This morning, a number of Oneida Indians came
to our lodgings, and informed, that two of their
 number had just come from the Rapids, and brought
tidings, that it was reported there, that Wayne's
army was advancing, and large numbers of the In-
dians had left the Council, to go to defend their
towns. They sent to the Oneidas to repair to their
assistance, which they were resolved not to comply
with. Which determination, we endeavored to
 strengthen, and gave it as our opinion, that the army
was not advancing, and would not advance, until
the result of the treaty was known. They were
very jealous of some deception, which it was hard
to remove. This forenoon, had a solid meeting in the ship-
yard; after which, a number of the gentlemen of the
town came to see us. In a little time, one came,
who announced the Dunmore was at the mouth of
the river, with the commissioners on board. Soon
 after, Capt. Gibbons , who was a passenger, came
and confirmed the news. We had appointed a meet-
ing at five o'clock, and thought best to endeavour
for stillness at present. The afternoon meeting was
not so large as the former. It was a season of heavy
exercise, through the prevalence of a carnal, luke-
warm disposition, in many; yet the great Shepherd
was mercifully pleased to baptize a remnant into
tenderness of spirit; and the opportunity concluded
with solemn supplication. In the evening, we had a visit from ____ Gibbons ,
an officer in the regiment of Queen's Rangers. He
was present when the Indians opened their embassy
to the commissioners, at Navy Hall. About ninety
Indians were there. When the governor, Simcoe ,
was present, Capt. Brant spoke as follows: “Gen-
tlemen, you say you are commissioners from the
United States; have you power to alter the disputed
line between you and us?" They answered, "We
have." "Can you tell us the reason of an armed
force advancing at this time into our country?" The
answer was, "We cannot, neither do we believe it;
yet to make all parties satisfied, we will despatch an
express immediately to the war office, to stop every
motion of an advance.” Then they said, "Come
on, we will treat with you.” Jasper Parrish was
despatched to Philadelphia. The commissioners not being permitted to come
here, were landed at the mouth of the river, and
have sent for us. 22nd. Settled with our landlord, Matthew Dolson ,
for six weeks accommodation, twelve pounds, seven
shillings, and six-pence, York money. 23rd. I visited Col. England , in company with
John Parrish , to confer with him, on the most eligi-
ble mode of departure from Detroit. He, with his
wonted politeness, offered his barge; but gave it as
his sentiment, that we had better stay till fifth-day,
when the Dunmore would sail, to be at the commis-
sioners' direction. As it was his orders, it was also
his inclination, to accommodate them, all in his
power, we consented to add two days more to our
 confinement. We had an interview with several Indians to-day;
one of them acknowledged he had killed a Kuhemo-
comon, and stole three horses this spring. He was
a warlike creature, and we could do little with him,
for want of an interpreter. I gave him a few hints,
a pipe, and a loaf of bread, and he departed. 24th. A solemn morning; my mind composed,
and engaged in mental aspirations to the Supreme
Controller of events, that he might be pleased to
bless our endeavours to promote the glory and ho-
nour of his own great name, the advantage of our
country, the peace of nations, and of individuals. —
In which I beheld, that so long as we dwelt only on
the surface, and superficies of important subjects, in
a chain of carnal reasoning, and in the fogs and mists
of earthly wisdom and human policy, we are in dan-
ger of making errors in judgment, and of viewing
the agents of distress, as the primary cause of evil.
But by tracing effects to their causes, and weighing
 actions in the equal and unalterable scales of justice
and truth, I believe we shall centre in prospect with
the inspired penman, “Affliction cometh not forth
 of the dust, neither doth trouble spring out of the
ground." Is there not a cause? Consider, yea,
awfully contemplate the announced decree of Him
"who weigheth the mountains in scales, and the
hills in a balance, and meteth out the heavens with
a span, and measureth the water of the seas in the
hollow of his hand; and before whom, all nations
are but as the drop of a bucket," — "Such measure
as ye mete, to you it shall be measured again." When I view the dreadful scenes of barbarity, at-
tendant on the African slave trade, and its train of
concurrent circumstances, my soul is almost over-
whelmed with discouragement. Judgment is the
Lord's, and he surely will repay. Have the Indians
burned houses; murdered men, women, and chil-
dren; betrayed their friends; carried away into cap-
tivity and bondage, old and young, male and female;
and cruelly burned and tortured others; lurked pri-
vily for prey; shot down men at their ploughs, and
travellers on the road? Yea, they have; until the
 rehearsal of many of their horrid scenes of barbar-
ity, has agitated, shocked, and almost convulsed
every nerve. But what shall I say? How are my feeling
wounded, on being constrained to contrast these
reproaches to humanity, with the conduct of civi-
lized, professing Christian nations? In which I la-
ment, our own government (in most respects, super-
latively excellent) is obliged to take a share. Ves-
sels fitted out, commanded by men, with hearts cal-
lous to the feelings of humanity, and deaf to her
cries — which repair to the African coast, stir up
war, burn towns, kill, catch, and carry captive, in-
discriminately, these poor, and, as to them, altoge-
ther unoffending people — bring them to distant and
 different cities and towns, ringing with alarms for
worship, sounding with hymns and psalms from
stately temples, where they offer their devotion to
the universal Parent, who hath revealed his will in
the language of "do justly, love mercy, and walk
humbly with thy God" — professing to believe in
the Divine Lawgiver, whose statute is, "Whatso-
ever ye would that men should do unto you, do ye
even so unto them." Instead whereof, they are sold
like beasts, at market; separated, husband from wife,
children from parents; without regard to the tender-
est ties of natural affection: often put under unfeel-
ing whippers, and cruel taskmasters, where they are
frequently starved, or whipt to death — and if they
run away, and are caught, they have been hung up
without trial or jury. Some who had procured their
liberty, have been hunted with horses and dogs, and
 shot down. While such enormities are in the land,
and winked at by the rulers, shall we not lay our
mouths in the dust, with this language impressed on
our minds, "O Lord! just, and true, and righteous,
are thy judgments." I cannot omit remarking the
joy we feel, at the escape of a captive white, from
among the Indians; yet, what a stir when a negro
slave attempts his liberty! advertisements printed,
 and rewards offered to take him, alive or dead. This afternoon, had a visit from Fransey Baubee ,
just returned from the assembly of Upper Canada,
where the subjecet of slavery was closely debated.
Gov. Simcoe appeared an advocate on the side of
 liberty. But so strong was the opposition from mo-
tives of interest, they could carry the subject no fur-
ther, than liberty at twenty-five years of age, to all
born after this date. Which account increased my
exercise for the lamentable state of mankind. Blood
touching blood, mingled with tears of the oppressed,
whose groans ascend to the ears of the Lord of Sa-
baoth. While others live on their labours, in volup-
tuousness, ease, and pride, spending days and nights
in revelling, feasting, fiddling, dancing, drunkenness,
debauchery, and abominable conversation. On which
account, I do believe, the earth and its inhabitants
will be made to tremble, and the ears of many be
made to tingle. 25th. Took an affiectionate leave of Matthew Dol-
son and Hannah, and divers other inhabitants of De-
troit, and went on board the Dunmore; Col. England ,
Lieut. Henry , Ensign Ross , and Edward O'Brian ,
 accompanying us. Many of the officers of the gar-
rison, and inhabitants of the place, came to the wharf,
to take leave of us. Among the latter, is a very re-
spectable family, of the name of Reynolds. They
have an amiable daughter, Margaret . We proceeded
down the river, and at one o'clock, arrived at Capt.
 Elliott's house, at the mouth of it. Landed in the
colonel’s barge, and were gladly received by the
commissioners, after about eight weeks absence: the
joy was mutual. Capt. Banbury , Gen. Cheaping ,
and Lieut. Givenz were there. They accompanied
the commissioners from Niagara. 26th. Walked down the river, one mile and a
half, to Simon Girty 's, a great white-man-chief
among the Wyandots. He was not at home. Re-
turned, and had some agreeable conversation with
General Cheaping , on Indian affairs; also concerning
women's preaching. He appears to be a judicious
man in most respects. 27th. Had a solid conversation with Gov. Ran-
dolph, Capt. Ford , and Lieut. Givenz , of the army, —
on slavery, war, swearing, and debauchery. When
men are closely pinched, I find their nearest way to
get rid of a difficulty, is a denial of the Scriptures,
turn Deists, and explain away the weighty parts of
the moral law. 28th. First-day. Walked three miles, and were
 paddled about three miles more in a canoe, by two
Indians, to a meeting we had appointed on the
Island of Grosseel, where fifty or sixty people col-
lected, who behaved with solid gravity. We were
favoured to feel an evidence of the simplicity, purity,
and spirituality of the gospel dispensation, which I
hope was preached to them in the pure disinterested
love thereof. We returned with peaceful minds and
thankful hearts. After meeting, a woman said, she
blushed to tell me, that the preceding evening, she
joined with others, in condemning us as wolves in
 sheep's clothing; but she was now fully convinced,
that what she had been seeking abroad amongst forms
and shadows, was to be found at home in her own
heart; and hoped to retain a thankful remembrance
of the mercy vouchsafed to her that day: adding,
she did not lament her troubles and exercises, which
were great, seeing they had, at length, brought her
to the discovery of the way of life. Many others,
 I believe, were reached this day. Yet my joy was
not of long continuance; for about eight o'clock in
the evening, some of our jolly fellow-travellers, pro-
moted an Indian dance, in which they joined. The
Indians were about twenty in number, with several
white men in the ring, and a candle in the centre.
Round and round they danced, with ungrateful grunt-
ing, barking, and at intervals, screaming and hollow-
ing — the war dance, the peace dance, the scalping
dance, &c. which they continued till near midnight,
frequently regaling themselves with spirits. This
conduct, considering the solemn importance of our
business, proved very exercising to my mind, and
almost overwhelmed me with discouragement. 29th. I felt heavy, and sorrowful, on account
of the last evening's conduct, which I suggested to
some of our leading gentlemen. I also testified my
disapprobation of such conduct, to the Indians; in
which I was joined by a squaw, whose husband, by
way of apology, told me, white men promoted it,
and joined them in it. This I was constrained to
admit, however degrading. So that upon the whole,
contrasting Indians and whites, of all nations, upon
the broad scale, our superiority appears but imag0-
nary, and does not exist. About five o'clock this afternoon, arrived Capt.
 Elliott, Capt. McKee , Simon Girty , and one Smith,
with Ocohongehelas , the great Delaware war chief,
and about twenty other Indians from Miami. The
Indians encamped opposite to us, on Bay’s Long
Island. The white men came over to us, and in-
formed, that the Indians were much dissatisfied, on
the report of their deputation to the commissioners
at Niagara; and had sent their second embassy, ex-
plicitly to declare their intentions in writing, signed
by ten nations. This is to be presented to-morrow,
and it is apprehended will determine the business. 30th. A deputation of twenty-five Indians, came
over the river about nine o'clock; when seated, the
commissioners seated before them, and we forming
an angle at the Indians' right hand, after a solemn
pause, an Indian inquired, "Are you ready?" Si-
mon Girtywas told to answer, yes. Then a Wy-
andot chief arose, took off his hat, and thanked the
Great Spirit, they had met; and spoke some time,
introductory to the delivery of a written message:
wherein they state, that matters were not fully ex-
plained at Niagara; therefore they explicitly require
an answer, whether the commissioners have power
to make Ohio the boundary; and if so, immediately
 to remove all the inhabitants off the land, west of
the Ohio? To which, Gen. Lincoln (after all three
 had read it, and consulted together) answered, they
would inform them to-morrow. After this, we had
a solid conference with the commissioners, on the
obstacles thrown in the way, and they explained the
Niagara conference; which we approved as fair and
candid. This demand appeared a new matter, pro-
bably suggested by some designing enemy to peace.
The letter was signed by ten nations, viz. Dela-
wares, Shawnese, Miamis, Wyandots, Ottawas, Min-
goes, Munseys, Chipawas, &c. 31st. About nine o'clock, the Indians came over
 the river, among whom, Ocohongehelas , the Dela-
ware war chief, his brother, and Little Jonny , a
 Shawnese chief, and Carry-all-about , a Wyandot
chief, were principal men. We spoke to them, and
told them we were their brothers, the Quakers, come
 from Philadelphia, to see them. They showed joy
in their countenances, and shook hands very affec-
tionately. They told us their chiefs, who knew us,
were almost all dead. We answered them, our fa-
thers who were acquainted with our Indian brothers,
were likewise mostly fallen asleep; but notwith-
standing, we their children, possessed the same love
and friendship for the Indians, as our fathers did;
and wished it to continue to the end of time. They
were very solid, and their countenances marked
with the weight and importance of the business. We
smoked with them; but perceiving their minds un-
der such pressure and exercise, we did not talk much.
They told us, through Girty , that they could not
now say much; but would, after they got their an-
swer. They staid about two hours, and received no-
tice from the commissioners, that about five o'clock
in the afternoon, they should have an answer to the
embassy. Then they returned to the island. This forenoon, four British officers came down
from the garrison; Crawford , Vandeleur , Ross , and
Eddy — also, Capt. Thomas , McGee, Baubee , Bun-
berry, and Givenz . Capt. Caldwell and Thomas
Smith, dined with us, and waited the return of the
Indian deputation. About five o'clock, the Indians
came. About six, the commissioners came out. —
 Col. Pickering politely addressed them; then read,
and Thomas Jones interpreted it into Seneca, in
substance — beginning at the treaty of Fort Stanwix,
twenty-five years ago, and recited the terms, that
Ohio was then, concluded to be the boundary.—
Then recited subsequent treaties, beginning at Fort
Stanwix, about nine years ago, and one held ninety
days after, at one place, another, at another, until
 he mentioned four different places, and the proceed-
ings of each. That in consequence of these treaties,
the United States had sold large tracts of land, which
were now settled, and largely improved, on the north
west side of the Ohio. Therefore, impossible now
to make it the boundary: and that, in order to come
to a peace, and to understand each other perfectly,
 by writing, was not the way. Which new mode
they had adopted, contrary to all former precedents.
But he explicitly declared, the United States wished
for peace, on the most just and unequivocal terms.
 Which, as the Indians demanded, and no better way
opened, were inserted — viz. That what the United
States wished for, was, to have all the lands ceded
by the treaty at Fort Harmer, confirmed; and a
small piece at the Falls of Ohio, for Gen. Clarke 
 and his warriors. And, if all that land could not
be given up, they were commissioned to draw a
new boundary, as might be agreed upon in general
council, if that could be obtained; for which, they
would advance more money than ever had been ad-
vanced, at any one treaty, as a purchase for Indian
lands, with much goods: in addition to which, they
would engage to pay an annual subsidy in goods,
accommodated to their wants, equal to what they
annually procured off the lands, by skins and peltry.
And further, as formerly, some improper ideas had
been held up, td their uneasiness, that in conse-
quence of the right of pre-emption, given up by the
king of Great Britain, and lately confirmed by Lord
Dorchester, we considered all the lands east and
south of the Mississippi and the Lakes, the proper-
ty of the United States, without regard to Indian
claims. Which right, or pretension of right, we
 publicly disclaimed, until fair purchase was made
of the Indian owners; and this right of purchase,
belonged to the United States only. That these
were the leading traits of their commission. This
was read by Col. Pickering , and interpreted into
the Seneca tongue by Thomas Jones . It concluded
about dark; when the paper, containing the above
sentiments, was delivered to the old Wyandot chief,
the English of whose name is,King of all the Na-
tions, who said, they would reply to it to-morrow
afternoon. They then departed to their camp, and
we to our tents. It was a cool night; but the exer-
cise of my mind, arising from the importance of
the business, was such, that I could hardly forbear
 trembling. The countenances of the Indians, were
 so sedate, solid, and determined, that notwithstand-
ing the propositions held out, appeared to be liberal,
 and well adapted to the happiness of the Indians,
 yet, such was their jealousy, and want of faith in
 our government, that I was afraid they would not
 take. Which apprehensions, with the screams and
 hollows of an Indian dance, near our tents, inter-
rupted my repose for hours. 1st of 8th mo. I awoke about day-break; soon
 after, I heard ten reports of a rifle, one after ano-
ther, in the Indian camp; which was one for each
 nation that had signed the written Indian embassy,
 from the council at the Rapids. About eight o’clock,
 fifteen of them came over, and informed, they were
prepared to speak to the commissioners; who soon
seated themselves: when the old king who spoke be-
fore, said, Brothers, we want to be at peace with
you; but you tell us you have had treaties there,
and there, and there, and purchased lands on this
 side the Ohio: but there has been no treaty since
the treaty of Fort Stanwix, twenty-five years ago,
till now. We are the owners of these lands, and
we never sold the lands, and they are ours on this
side Ohio, and yours on the other side Ohio. You
may go home and tell Washington what we speak.
We understand all you said to us, very well. We
expect you understand us. They had Simon Girty 
for an interpreter. They then arose, and stepped
off a few perches, and spoke together, when one
found he had made a mistake, in saying we might
go home, and desired the commissioners to wait, till
they could go to the council, and return with an
answer; which they supposed might be accomplish-
ed in five days. We felt some willingness to accom-
pany them, but the Indians not requesting it, and
others not appearing desirous for it, particularly
Capt. Elliott and McKee ,* who were going along,
we had to resign it. However, we forwarded our
Address, and a short epistle to the Indians, which
we had intended to send from Detroit by Capt. El-
liott, some weeks ago; but the commissioners arri-
ving before he set out, he showed our letters to
them, and they thought proper to detain them, pre-
suming we would have an opportunity with them
at the general Council, ourselves. After opening
and reading them, they encouraged us to send them,
 though at a late stage of the business. About ten
o'clock, the Indians embarked in a boat, for the
Rapids; and Capt. McKee , Capt. Elliott , Thomas
Smith, and Major Hay , set off in another boat, for *See, Speech of Hekis, a chief of the Pottawotamies, page
25, of Halliday Jackson 's Work on Indian Civilization, lately
published in Philadelphia. the same place. Previous to their setting off, I took
an opportunity to impress their minds with the im-
portance of the present critical juncture; as also,
 how deeply the interests of humanity was involved
in it. My mind is often involuntarily impressed
with a secret sorrow, and sense of the want of true
 sincerity, in this painful business; in which I see
 different schemes and opposite interests are engaged;
while the poor natives stand exposed as a mark, to
their grievous injury, and suffering, under an undue
 influence. 2nd. Feeling blank and empty, I took a walk into
the woods, which are marshy and flat, in every place
I can find, about a mile from all the lakes and rivers:
which space is rich and fertile land. The inland
parts of the country abounding with extensive
swamps, covered with bushes, coarse grass, rushes,
and flags, make harbours for such innumerable
 flights of blackbirds, as prove very injurious to the
production of the neighboring farms, taking nearly
one-third of their small grain, notwithstanding the
exertions of gunners, children, &c. 3rd. The Detroit sloop came down the river, bound
to Fort Erie, by which I wrote a letter to my dear
 H.L. 4th. Last night was wet — our tents did not ex-
clude the mist, which wet our blankets and clothes
considerably. I wrote a letter to my daughter, Ma-
ry Miller, and attended a meeting at Simon Girty ’s,
 in the afternoon; Gen. Lincoln , Gen. Cheaping , Capt.
Carry Hamilton, and Givenz , with a number of In-
dians and Negroes, present, to our satisfaction. Many of the officers of the army are very de-
bauched, and immoral characters, notwithstanding
 their civility and kindness to us. There was a cap-
tain much addicted to profane swearing in our com-
pany, and who kept a squaw; upon being put in mind
of the odiousness of such a course of life, and the dan-
ger he stood in, replied, he thought no harm would
 ensue — that we might think it very strange, that he
 never lay down, drunk or sober, without saying his
 prayers. Which, strange as it was, he asserted was
 the case. 5th. The Detroit sloop left this place, loaded with
 skins and peltry, for Fort Erie. I spent some part
of this day, on the margin of the river, and bay.
Here once stood the town and garrison of Detroit.
 Multitudes of graves, and many foundations of build-
ings are yet discoverable. We are told, about seven-
ty years ago, the Indians rose, and in one night mas-
sacred every person in the place, except the Ro-
man priest, who was concealed by a squaw; and also
burnt all the houses. After which, the garrison was
built eighteen miles higher up the river, on the op-
posite side, where it now stands. Since the English
have been in possession of Canada, some bold at-
tempts of like nature, have been made: one by the
noted Indian, Pontiac, on the present Detroit; which,
in all human probability, would have succeeded, but
for some intelligence from a squaw, communicated
the evening preceding the intended bloody enter-
prize, to the commander, who afterwards attempted
 to dislodge them from the suburbs. This brought
on the fray, from whence bloody bridge took its
 name, where three officers and seventy soldiers are
reported to have fallen, about a mile and a half above
Detroit. When the veteran saw himself the con-
queror, it inspired him with ambition to get upon
 Fighting Island, and attack one of the king's ships,
 laden with stores for the garrison. As the channel
 obliged her to come within musket shot of the island,
where a large number of Indians had placed them-
selves, and the ship lay becalmed, they poured in
bullets, like hail, against her side, hoping to have
sunk her. But finding, after two days experiment,
 their metal too light to effect their purpose, they
 took to their canoes, and made to her with toma-
hawks in hand. Many got on board, notwithstand-
ing the efforts of the few mariners; and when all
were expecting death in a few minutes, the captain,
a resolute man, gave orders aloud, "Blow up the
 ship" — he having powder on board; and one of the
 Indians understanding English, terrified with the
horrid orders, gave the alarm quickly to his com-
panions, who instantly jumped off the vessel, some
into their canoes, and others into the water. Thus
the vessel, and many lives, were saved. It is remarkable, that on the same day the before
 mentioned attempt was made on Detroit, by Pon-
tiac; Michilimackinac, St. Josephs, and Presque-Isle
 garrisons were all attacked, and carried by the In-
dians. 6th. Last night, the musquetoes exceeded any
 thing of the kind I ever experienced. Universal
complaint was murmured through the camp this
 morning; by both house, tent, and ship lodgers; by
which it appeared, the attack was general. This
confirmed an account I heard in this country, of a
fortification being erected in New Spain, in the fore-
part of the year, which, on account of the incredible
number of these insects, which infested it, the troops
were obliged to abandon. This day, about three o'clock, whilst a large com-
pany of us were dining sumptuously, and drinking
wine in the parlour, among whom were James Ab-
bott, Sparkman , and Lawyer Roe , from Detroit, the
 awful language of mortality was inscribed in the kit-
chen, by the decease of a poor, emaciated Paunee
slave , who had been declining some time. Our be-
loved friend, Joseph Moore , attended him, in his
last moments, travailing with him, in Christian sym-
pathy, I trust to the staying of his mind, in the so-
lemn period. Some others, to my astonishment,
 treated it with as much indifference, as if only a
 caterpillar had been bruised. After dinner, I retired
about thirty perches into a garden, where the loud
 peals of laughter, which could easily have been heard
half a mile, were truly distressing. I mentioned the
solemn subject to one of the British officers, who
replied, "One of my brother officers, whom I loved
dear as my life, was departing lately; I went to him,
and bid him farewell; poor fellow, God help you:
and returned to drink wine." A few boards being
nailed together, about sun-set the same day, the
corpse was put in, and attended to the grave, on
the river bank, by about sixty persons, including
 Indians and Negroes, where Joseph Moore preached
 his funeral sermon; and there was an end of poor
 Toby 's pilgrimage. 7th. A day of close inward exercise, on discover-
ing in several of our company, an eye watching for
evil, and seeking occasion to vilify and reproach us:
and thereby, to undervalue, and lay waste our tes-
timony, to the requisite purity of the gospel — and
if possible, to render us as abandoned as themselves. 8th. This day, the lake is exceeding rough, which
 must retard the return of the Indian chiefs, who have
 now been gone seven days. This evening, two Mohicons arrived from the In-
dian council, who brought us a letter from Captain
 Hendricks Apaumut, who informs, there is a pros-
pect of a treaty commencing in a very few days. —
 The messengers state, that sickness, and a great
 mortality prevails in the Indian camp — which took
 off a worthy man of their nation, named Sam , with
 whom I was acquainted. 9th. This morning, twelve Chipawas, Delawares,
 and Munseys, called to see us, on their return home,
 having staid till their clothes were mostly in rags,
and I believe, they were alarmed at the contagion.
 They report the decease of seventeen Indians,
 amongst whom were three Chipawa chiefs; and in-
form, that in consequence of the sickly situation,
 they were about to move their camp eight miles
 down the river, near the side of the lake. Which
 is agreeable to us, as it will be so much nearer, and
not so much infested with musquetoes. 10th. Last evening, several of the Indians, who
 arrived in the morning, came to us, much disguised
 with liquor, and wanted more: which not being
granted, they became rather sulky, rude, and inso-
lent. One of them, who called himself Capt. Her-
maunus, laid hold of me, partly in jest, and squeezed
 me hard, and said, you Quaker, you my brother.
 One said, his heart was bad, and another said, I am
a devil, and my name is devil. Several of our com-
pany, best acquainted with Indians, appeared alarm-
ed with apprehensions of danger, and did not go
into their tents till near morning. About eight
 o’clock, one of them came from the camp, who ex-
hibited a horrid spectacle — hallooing, I am a man —
 I am a warrior — dashing his fist against a tree, drew
 out his scalping knife, brandished it through the air
with uplifted hand, roaring and making a terrible
appearance. At length a sober Indian came, and
took him away. However, with the trouble of In-
dians, and a host of musquetoes, I dont know that
I slept ten minutes during the night. We dined this day on a masquenungy, which
weighed eighteen pounds; a very delicious fish. It
 was speared by an Indian. Lake Erie abounds with
sturgeons so plentifully, that a couple of men have
taken more than a ton weight before breakfast. It
is said, they originated from four of that species
having been put in, above the falls, by a French
 officer; before which, it is reported, none were to
be found above the great falls; and when first dis-
covered by the Indians, they were much alarmed. 11th. The Ottoway schooner, arrived from Fort
Erie, in which came Jasper Parrish , who left Phila-
delphia twenty-seventh of last month. He brought
 me letters from my beloved brother and sister
 Dawes, and my daughter Mary , which were very
cordial and refreshing; also, the newspapers con-
taining much information. This afternoon, the Chipawa fell down from De-
troit, bound for Fort Erie, in which upwards of
twenty Oneida Indians returned, being tired out
 with waiting; some had got sick, and all were rag-
ged and dirty. This day, had a meeting on Groes-isle, which, on
some accounts, was a trying season, but we return-
ed with peaceful minds. 12th. Wrote by way of Fort Pitt, to my dear
 H.L. ; also a letter by Lieut. Crawford , to George
 Dillwyn. 13th. Our commissioners had a visit from Capt.
 Welbank, on his return from Navy Hall; he gave
 them an account, as I have before noted, respecting
the treaty with the southern Indians; also mention-
ed some of McGillivrey 's duplicity in Indian affairs;
and that the Spanish governor of Pensacola told
him, he was sorry he had sold off so much land to
the United States; and that he could not serve two
masters, he must cleave to the one or the other, and
he might choose which. It appeared that McGil-
livrey had proposed to sell to the south branch of
 the Ocomic river; but the nation at large withstood
it, and would give up no further than the north;
 to which the Creeks unitedly agreed. That divers
 attempts had been made to settle it, and large clear-
ings were made upon it; but at present, he believed,
 there was not a standing house on the space of three
 hundred miles in length, and from thirty to seventy
 in breadth, according to the windings of the river.
Which space, is the bone of contention at present,
 with the Creek nation. Welbank also says, the
 Spaniards are industriously making interest with
 the southern Indians, through the agency of one
 Oliver , a Frenchman: which is a subject of a seri-
ous nature to our government. This afternoon, the commissioners sent off two
 Oneida Indians express to Col. McKee ; I suppose,
to let him know, that the tedious process of the
business began to feel unpleasant to many of the
 company. One of the interpreters, Horatio Jones ,
 had lately heard of the decease of his wife, since
 he left home, and several of our company were
sick. I spent this evening with Capt. Welbank , and
Capt. Bunbury , at Capt. Caldwell 's, where Capt.
Welbank talked freely respecting the southern In-
dians, and their confederates; among whom was the
governor of Pensacola, and the Indian nations quite
to the Mississippi, and the mountain Leader also,
who was considered fully attached to the interest of
the United States. All which intelligence, with
the present tardy process of our commission, im-
pressed my mind with ideas of horror and distress,
approaching our extensive frontier, with some
doubts, that the speculation in western estates, will
 be disastrous to public tranquility and peace. 14th. Col. England wrote to Capt. Bunbury , to
despatch the Dunmore to Fort Erie. Bunbury , ha-
ving Gov. Simcoe 's orders in writing, to keep her
for the convenience and protection of the commis-
sioners, withstood the colonel's orders. 15th. Three Wyandots came to our camp, and
report they have received accounts from the Indian
council, that they had at length agreed to invite us
to the council. This day my head felt much disor-
dered, occasioned, I supposed, by getting wet in our
tent by rain, just as we lay down. William Savery 
poorly, Jasper Parrish very ill, also Horatio Jones 
and Joseph Moore complaining. 16th. My mind much tossed — looking towards
 home — then to the Yearly Meeting. I took a walk
down the river, where I erected a seat under the
spreading boughs of a buttonwood, of whose branch-
es and broad leaves I made a carpet, and sat myself
down in the native splendor of one of the aboriginal
 lords of the land. I contemplated the tranquil abode
of our first parents in the garden, and felt happy for
a moment, which was succeeded by the reflection
on Jonah's gourd, which it most resembled. I felt
a necessity to breathe for the approach of that peace-
ful and blessed day, when every man shall sit under
his own vine, and fig-tree, and none shall make him
 afraid. This afternoon, two young Wyandots arrived.
They looked wild and afraid. One of them was
 introduced to Gen. Lincoln , and handed him a mes-
sage in writing, importing that the several treaties
held at Fort McIntosh, Miami, Muskingum, &c.
 where lands had been ceded by two or three nations
 only, were not valid; as they had no right to dispose
 of lands. And as for the large sums of money pro-
posed to be paid down for the country, they did not 
want it; and a great many of them did not know the
 use of it. Therefore, desired it might be applied,
 with the proposed yearly salary, to the indemnifica-
tion of the settlers north of the Ohio. And as they
supposed they were mostly poor people, or else they
would not have settled on disputed lands; that there-
by they might be induced to move off; and make
the Ohio the boundary. For it was their land — the
 country to the westward was filled up — they had no
where else to repair to, and they were determined
to lay their bones in it. As to the concessions, the
 commissioners proposed to make, by giving money,
 they did not want it: next, running a new line, was
but giving them a part of their own land; and as to
 disclaiming the right to all their country, by virtue
of the peace made with the king, their father, they
knew they were never conquered, and it could not
 be; and as to the right of pre-emption, that the Uni-
ted States, and they only, had a right to purchase
Indian lands, south and east of the lakes, they de-
nied the king or the United States ever having any
such right. Upon the whole, it was received as a
very contemptible speech by the commissioners, and
strongly marked as British manufacture. The two
Indian messengers had a glass of wine each, and
victuals set. They eat but little, got up and slipped
away, I believe conscious that the contents of their
message would not be pleasing. This soon appear-
ed to be the case, as the baggage was ordered on
board the Dunmore immediately — some for safety
proposing to sleep on board. It felt exceeding gloomy to Friends. We got to-
gether to see if any thing opened further for us to
do; which at present does not appear. Therefore
submit the awful subject to the interposition of the
Divine Hand, and turn our eyes towards our respec-
tive habitations. This evening the two runners des-
patched three days ago to the Indian council, return-
ed, with only a verbal message, importing that the
five nations expected us to come forward, and were
moving six miles down the river, to meet us. Which
appeared a cunning manœuvre of one side, or the
other. I was somewhat put to a consternation, on
hearing Gen. Lincoln express, they had received just
such an answer as he could have wished. What his
meaning was, I don't know. 17th. Several of our company slept on board the
 Dunmore last night, others hurrying on board this
 morning. Two runners were despatched with in-
telligence to the Six Nations. About 11 o'clock,
 we were all on board. My mind felt sorrowful, in
 reflecting on the important subject of our journey.
But on turning my mind to consider, if we had omit-
ted any thing we might have done, or what might
yet remain to be done, nothing appeared to give un-
easiness. I therefore rested satisfied in leaving it
 to the Lord, who judgeth righteously; and with joy
 turned mine eye homeward, willing to leave a set-
tlement so greatly dissipated with every species of
 iniquity, that they appear to live almost without law,
 morality, or religion. 18th. Prosecuting our voyage on the lake — in the
afternoon, we were nearly becalmed — had a season
of solid retirement in the cabin, to our comfort and
satisfaction, though held in much contempt by others,
who were wise and good enough already, in their
own eyes. 19th. Very little wind. Our vessel thronged, ha-
ving thirty-one passengers, exclusive of the ship's
crew, and two bears. 20th. Our vessel glided along in the prospect of
the Looming hills, the land claimed and held by the
Delaware Indians. This day, several little birds
came on board our vessel. 21st. This day, we could just discover both shores
from the middle of the lake. In the evening, had
some religious conversation with Capt. Ford , to
satisfaction. 22nd. One of our sailors laid hold of a rope on the
boom of our vessel, which gave way, and he fell
over the stern into the water — being a calm time,
 he recovered by laying hold of a rope thrown out
 to him. Through the favour of Divine Providence, we
came safe to anchor, about one o'clock in the morn-
ing of the 23rd, at Fort Erie. The surf was so high
all that day, we could not land our baggage. 24th. We settled our accounts with Capt. Ford for
our passage down Lake Erie. I agreed with the
commissioners for a horse, proposing to ride home.
This afternoon, Randolph , Pickering , and their ser-
vants, crossed the river to the mouth of Buffalo
creek, on their way home, proposing to take the
route of Albany. William Savery , and William
Hartshorne, agreed to return by water, with Gen.
Lincoln. Joseph Moore , and myself, went five
miles down the river to lodge at our kind friend,
Benjamin Wilson's . John Elliott , and John Par-
rish, went up the lake about eight miles, to look out
 some Friends, there settled. Col. Pickering and Gen. Lincoln , through the
whole of the journey, so far as I have seen, have
conducted as men of religion and sobriety. 25th. Joseph Moore , and myself, visited the fami-
lies of Joseph Marsh , Adam Burrell , and Joseph
Havens. Went to Esau Schooley 's to lodge, where
we were heartily welcomed, and kindly entertained. 26th. Visited the families of John Herrit , John
Cutler, and Esau Schooley . Lodged at John Cut-
lers, who has a family of hopeful children. 27th. Appointed a meeting at Joseph Havens . It
was a solid, comfortable season. After which, John
Elliott, and myself, visited Daniel Pound 's family,
and lodged there. 28th. Visited Joseph Havens , Adam Burrell , and
Joseph Marsh 's families. At the latter, we lodged. 29th. checkPlace Attended an appointed meeting, at Major
Powell's, where many people assembled. It was
attended with a solemnity becoming the occasion.
 We lodged at the house of the kind and hospitable
 Major Powell . 30th. checkPlace Preparing for my journey through the wil-
derness. I lodged at Peter Wintmuts , and Friends
at Benjamin Wilson 's. 31st. We crossed the river at Windecker 's ferry.
Waited at Winey 's, on Buffalo creek, for Adam
Lane, who was intending for the States. 1st of 9th mo. From Winey 's, at Buffalo creek,
 passed through twenty miles of good land — some 
parts swampy — others high, and suitable for wheat —
abounding with limestone, sugar trees, bass wood, 
beech, and shellbark hickory — and about twenty 
miles of plains. In which distance, are three fine 
streams for mills, with excellent fall. Two as large 
as one of the forks of Brandywine, the other as large 
as Whiteclay creek. In the swamps and timber 
lands, the path was rendered difficult by hundreds 
of logs across the way. We met one Indian on the 
plains, he was pleased to see us — we gave him some 
refreshment. Came across Red Jacket and his fami-
ly, in the woods — he was indisposed — John Parrish 
ministered unto him. In the afternoon, we met two 
armed men, who looked grim. We pressed forward 
as far as possible, fearing they might covet one of 
our horses. A little after sun-set, we turned out our 
horses at the east end of the great plains, kindled a 
fire, and began to model a tent; when sable clouds 
obscured the azure sky, and made an awful appear-
ance, which was soon succeeded by tremendous peals 
of thunder, boisterous wind, and heavy rain. Many 
trees were blown down. We stood exposed to the 
vehemence of the elements, without any shelter, 
 not daring to stand by trees, for fear of lightning. 
It lasted near three hours, then cleared away. After this dreadful storm was over, we renewed 
our fire, which was almost extinguished by the rain, 
lay down on the wet ground in our wet clothes, 
contemplated the wondrous beauty of our spangled 
canopy, and rested some, having rode forty miles 
the preceding day. 2nd. Resumed our journey through a swampy, 
dreary wilderness, for above twenty miles, inter-
spersed with some ridges of very rich land. Passed 
over a fine stream for water works, where the water 
pitches off a fine limestone rock, six or seven feet at 
once. The banks are low and rich. Sometime after, 
passed over about ten miles of plains, in which is a 
curious spring, covering an acre and a half; the fall 
from it is rapid; — the stream as large as Whiteclay 
creek. Then passed through an Indian village, on 
the flats of the Genessee river: which exceeds any 
land I have seen for richness — the grass, pea vines, 
and thistles, higher than a man's head, on horse-
back. Thousands of acres fit for mowing — of which 
a great deal is cut, and makes excellent fodder, the 
pods and peas contributing thereto. We forded the 
river, now about as large as Brandywine. This 
place is thirty miles south of Ontario. Lodged at 
Berry 's, on the bank of the river, having rode thir-
ty-five miles. 3rd. Here we were refreshed, refitted, and pre-
pared to pursue our journey. Here many Indians 
resort — one old woman, supposed to exceed one 
hundred years — I admired her gray head. She said 
she was always kind and good, and always against 
 quarrels; therefore God had spared her to see the 
sun a long time. The land west of Genessee, belongs to the In-
dians. Robert Morris purchased the pre-emption 
right of the Massachusetts State, for one hundred 
and twenty thousand pounds. We persevered up the north-west side of the Gen-
nessee river, on the ridge, above thousands of acres 
of rich flats along the river below, abounding with 
grass as high as a man's head on horse-back; and 
when cultivated, has produced fifty bushels of wheat 
per acre. Took up lodging with James Miller , at 
Captain Williamson 's, having rode sixteen miles. —
The road from Berry ’s, here, is good. We met a 
number of Indians this day, who appeared friendly. 
We spoke to them by an interpreter. 4th. Set out early — missed our road ten miles, 
and had to return. Passed on through the Gennes-
see country about twelve miles, mostly excellent 
land: then over about twelve miles of mountains, 
well timbered with chesnut, pine, hemlock, &c.—
Then through about seven miles of piney valley, to a 
cabin of bark, where we struck up a fire after dark, 
thankful to have a house of our own: which was all 
the comforts we had, having nothing for ourselves 
or horses, to eat. 5th. Collected our horses, with some difficulty —
set out soon after day-light, and rode eleven miles 
to Bath, the seat of Captain Williamson , a little vil-
lage, where about twelve houses have been built this 
summer. Called at a public house, and got a break-
fast of good coffee. Set out after breakfast, and rode 
over, and round the ends of several high, barren 
mountains, sixteen miles, to the Painted Post; about 
 which, is abundance of excellent bottom and upland. 
Having mostly kept down the river Kohockton, for 
thirty miles. After refreshing ourselves, and feed-
ing our horses, rode along some excellent low lands, 
and crossed the Canistiere river, at its junction with 
the Chemung, or Tioga river, which we rode up,
thirteen miles, and got to Col. Lindley 's a little af-
ter dark. 6th. Set forward up the river, nine miles, to Ro-
berts's. Then set forward, along a tolerable road, 
up Tioga, for ten or twelve miles further, when we 
left the river, and ascended and descended several 
rugged hills, for about nine miles, hoping to have 
got to the Block-house. But the night proved very 
dark, and the pine timber so high and shady, that 
we could not make out the way. After alighting,
scrabbling for some distance through mud, bushes, 
&c. we were obliged to give up the idea of reaching 
the stage. Tied the horses to the bushes, very hun-
gry, as were ourselves also. John Parrish struck 
fire, which with much difficulty, we augmented into 
a blaze — blundered in the dark for wood, and at 
length got a comfortable fire. Laid down in our wet 
blankets and clothes; it having rained most of the 
preceding day, the ground was moist. 7th. Rose early, all in health, and rode about two 
miles to the Block-house, about thirty-seven miles 
from Col. Lindley 's. Breakfasted, and fed our horses 
well; then resumed our journey, seventeen miles, to 
Kyle 's, on Lycoming creek. The road mountainous 
and rough. Dined, and rode fourteen miles, to Win-
ters's. My mare very lame, having wrenched off 
two of her shoes in the mountains, forty miles back. 
Here we got our horses shod, and lodged. 8th. Attended Muncey meeting, to our comfort.
Dined at Samuel Wallace 's, and went to William
Ellis’s to lodge. 9th. Attended an appointed meeting at Muncey,
in the forenoon, and one at Samuel Harris 's in the 
afternoon: both large, — favoured seasons. 10th. Had a solemn parting opportunity with 
Samuel Wallace and William Ellis 's families. Left 
Loyalsock creek behind, crossed Muncey, and rode 
thirty miles, to Northumberland, a town of about 
thirty houses, pleasantly situated between the north 
and south branches of Susquehanna, at their junc-
tion: near which place, we crossed the Chilisquagus. 11th. Visited Hannah Miller , Richardson and 
wife, Josiah Haines and wife, in the forenoon; to 
the peace of my mind. Afternoon, had a solid meet-
ing in the Methodists' house. 12th. checkPlace Set out — crossed the west branch — rode 
down the west side of the river to Litle's ferry, 
where I rode the river: having travelled thirty-one 
miles. Lodged at Michael Bowers 's, whose wife is 
a daughter of Cornelius Lane , and desired her love 
to Thomas Gibson . Litle's ferry is twenty miles from Harrisburgh, 
and about three miles from Peters' mountain. Hence the company proceeded to their several 
homes — having been absent on this toilsome, exer-
cising journey, about four months and a half. 
Jacob Lindley . 